There was already no other choice but that. Just like what Shia and others almost did, Hajime and Yue would also aim for the scenery of the surface that became visible sometimes and leaped right toward the crumbling space itself in a desperate gamble.



But, no matter how it was unthinkable that they would have future by doing that. It was a mad attempt that wouldn’t even be a gamble. If an example had to be made, it was something like someone who was holding a bomb was trying to skillfully use the explosion so they might be able to be sent flying to far away. Even before thinking about being sent flying, there was no assurance that they wouldn’t be turned into small pieces beforehand.



But, even so they didn’t have the slightest intention to give up.



“…Yue.”



“Nn?”



“I love you.”



“Nn-, me too…I love you.”



With a calm condition that was unthinkable to come from people who were in front of a crumbling space, both of them expressed their feeling to each other. At last, the safe spot also became gone. The crack was also entering into the spot where the two were at.



Like that, *creak* an unpleasant sound resounded below them, both of them resolved themselves and they were going to leap into the space where the surface was visible, it was at that moment



{Choa―――! Appearing at a miraculous timiiing, the beautiful warrior, Miledy Raisen-tan☆ Has arrived! The one who is calling for me is you two isn’t ittt? Isn’t ittt?}



Something came out.



“ “…” “



Hajime and Yue’s eyes turned into dot spontaneously.



However, without paying any mind to such pair, the intruder opened her mouth with jetting up tension.



{What’s with thiiiisss, even though I have come with great pain to save you two from something like a piiinchhh, just where is the reactiooonn. Miledy-chan is going to cry here! I’m going to go hics hics, glance glance you knooow?}



“…Annoying.”



“…Nn. This is certainly Miledy.”



The staggering annoyingness finally lets the two to accept the spectacle in front of their eyes as reality. And then when they looked around, it seemed that the crumbling had been held back before they realized it.



“This is…your doing?”



{Fufun, I guess. Something this much is really easy for the liberator Miledy-chaaannn. Although I say that, it won’t last for more than several minutes though☆}



“…By any chance, you can, escape?”



{But of courseee! I came here after tossing away Rabbit-chan and others to the surface already see☆ What’s left is only you two pyon! As expected, me! What an able woman-! Yes, applause applause!}



The smiley mask was sparkling with some kind of mechanism while saying that kind of thing, putting aside how annoying the words were, the two of them were seriously feeling admiration and gratitude to Miledy. But at the same time, Hajime and Yue also became endlessly vexed.



But, Miledy’s next words broke the half-smiling face of the two.



{Hoi, this is the Degraded Arrow of World Crossing, the last one of it. It’s a defective product that is usable only in this kind of unstable space, but it should be enough for escaping. Next, a healing medicine for service! This should recover you to the degree that you can activate the arrow’s ability pyon! After you two drink that quickly gooo from here! Gooo! Leave the rest to Onee-san okaaayyy☆}



“…And you? You aren’t, going to get out with us?”



Glancing at the thrown Degraded Arrow of World Crossing which Yue caught, Hajime threw his question at Miledy. Because from her speech it was as though Miledy was going to stay behind in this crumbling space.



That guess appeared to be correct.



{Yep, I’m staying hereeee. If this kind of codswallop space is left alone, the surface will also get swallowed and cause a chaining crumbling after all. I’m going to straighten this up.}



“…From how, you speak…it’s like you are going to die here.”



Thanks to the healing medicine, Hajime had recovered to a degree that he could indeed activate the artifact, he then asked with a tone that had turned somewhat smoother.



Miledy answered to that question frankly.



{Yep. My, the plan is for my Super Secret☆Magic to guide the crumbling of Holy Precincts and compress it pon pon. The space is on the verge of breaking down, if this body of mine and my soul are used as a medium to magnify my magic power then it will be enough. That’s why, I’ll end here.}



“Self-sacrifice? That doesn’t suit you. Rather than that――”



Hajime whose nerves were rubbed the wrong way by the resigned speech was going to argue vehemently, but then a blonde beautiful girl around fourteen, fifteen years old appeared overlapping the Miledy-golem. It seemed to be the projection of soul, this must be the original appearance of Miledy.



In contrast with her joking around tone, that girl figure of Miledy was putting an extremely satisfied and also gentle expression toward Hajime and Yue.



{This is juuust self-satisfaction. My promise with my comrades, with my important people――’Let’s destroy the evil god and save the world!’ reaalllly, that sounds like a fairy tale and it looks stupid, but we exchanged that promise seriously, I want to fulfill it, that’s all pyon.}



“…”



{At that time, we couldn’t do anything and lost, everyone became scattered, but thinking ‘even so’, we created the great labyrinths…right now, in this time, in this place, is where I’ll use my whole strength for the sake of people, this is exactly the reason that I survive for this long mon.}



Hajime and Yue listened quietly to Miledy’s words that sounded like a monolog. The reason Miledy wanted to do this wasn’t because she wanted to bask in the joy of cheap self-satisfaction, they comprehended that right now in this time, Miledy was going to realize the feeling that she had continued to hold in her heart from so far in the past that they couldn’t even imagine.



Looking at such pair, Miledy narrowed her eyes with even more and more gentleness.



{Thank you, Nagumo Hajime-kun, Yue-chan. For granting our dearest wish. For using our magic correctly.}



“…Nn. Miledy. Your magic is the most useful.”



{Kufufu, naturally! After all it’s me! What I said before was also like that right? ‘As long as you keep being you, you will achieve godslaying without fail’, I said.}



“…’You can just live following your wish. After all, your choice will surely be the best for this world’, you also said that. Was my choice the best for this world?”



{Of course! Presently, after all, that shitty bastard has been blown away until beyond that world, and I am right here! And then this dreg of a life can be used now for the sake of people following my oath. …Finally, I can head to where everyone is in peace.}



Surely if this was a flesh body than glittering things would be overflowing from the corner of Miledy’s eyes. That was just how intense the flood of emotions that Miledy’s words were filled with, which made them thought that.



{Nooow, both of you. Soon it will be the limit for me to hold back the crumbling pyon. You two need to return back to the place of the people waiting for you. I too, will head toward the place where there are people waiting for me.}



The stagnating space was beginning to rumble once more.



Even while staggering, Hajime and Yue stood up somehow thanks to the healing medicine, the two of them activated the Degraded Arrow of World Crossing that was clutched by Yue’s hand while staring back straight at Miledy.



“…Miledy Raisen. My greatest respect to you. Many months and years have elapsed, yet, there is not a single scratch on that strength of will. That determination is the best article under the heaven beyond any doubt. Oscar Orcus. Naiz Guryuen. Mail Meljine. Laus Vaan. Ryuteris Haltina. Vandour Shune. I will never forget, you and your important people.”



“…Nn. There wasn’t a single thing, of the path of the struggles of you all that was pointless. We will impart it to the next generation, without fail.”



{Both of you…wha, what’s with you twoooo. Like that, I, cannot say anything at all! If you said something like that! Come on, this is really the limit! Just get lost already, get lost!}



Her expression looked embarrassed somehow, and yet it also seemed to be almost overwhelmed with emotion. Miledy faced away with a huff and she waved her hand to shoo them off.



The rumbling was getting fiercer and fiercer, the crumbling was beginning to approach once more.



Hajime and Yue displayed a faint smile at Miledy who wouldn’t meet their eyes while advancing to the edge of the crumbling chalk white surface. And then, they nodded at each other.



“Good bye, protector of the world.”



“…Sayonara.”



Saying that the two leaped down toward the crumbling space that looked like an abyss.



Miledy that was left behind sighed “Fuuuu”.



{Protector of the world, is it. Thaaat feels itchy. Saying that at the very end, is just foul. …Should I think of it, like a payback or something.}



While talking to herself, a black whirling sphere was created with her body as the center. While the sphere was sparking with something like black thunder, Miledy quietly lifted her gaze to the center of the black star of calamity.



Before she knew it, there, she could see the figures of her important people that didn’t lose color no matter who many months and years passed.



{Everyone…}



There was no word that came back. Perhaps this was the revolving lantern before one’s death, or just her hallucinating.



But, such thing was inconsequential.



{What, so you all came to pick me up. Ehehe, then, perhaps I should say it. Finally, I guess I can say it!}



The star of calamity was swallowing anything and everything at the surrounding. Other magic like ‘Severance Calamity’ or whatever couldn’t compare with this. It swallowed everything and pulverized them inside, yes, so to speak this was a black hole.



While the golem artifact which was used as the medium was vanishing without a trace, Miledy’s soul yelled with a voice and expression that were the very picture of innocence.



{Everyoneee, I’m homeee――!!}



At the next moment, the white space was soundlessly annihilated along with all light.



Part 2



The silver angels were falling down to the ground one after another like falling star, the dark red world was rumbling unceasingly, above where the sky should be visible originally, reversed other worlds could be seen wobbling dangerously. Those reversed many worlds could be seen starting to crumble from a glance.



The end of the world.



Such words passed through the brain of the people of the allied force. Even though the apostles who wielded furious might had stopped functioning, but they honestly couldn’t feel happy because of the scream that the world raised which they felt.



“Aa, god…”



Someone whispered so.



In front of the collapse of the world, the sword in their hand felt really tiny. Everyone was merely staring at the shaking above worlds in a daze without being able to do anything else.



At that time, a dignified voice resounded. It wasn’t someone like a god that couldn’t be seen or anything. But it was someone who was right on their side, the ‘Goddess of Harvest’ that had struggled through the line of death together with them――the voice of Hatayama Aiko.



{Everyone, there is no need to despair! That person is over there! Right now, even in this moment, he should be fighting that evil god! The apostles falling, the worlds in the sky breaking, they all are the proof of the evil god’s suffering! That’s why-, let’s pray! For the victory of that person! For the victory of mankind-! Now, match your voice! Let’s show our will!}



The battlefield fell as silent as grave.



Aiko’s words weren’t something that came from the speech compilation Hajime gave her. The proof of that could be seen from how she was calling Hajime as ‘that person’ rather than ‘my sword’. It was undoubtedly a yell that came from Aiko’s own heart. Those words displayed Aiko’s will that believed on the safety of Hajime and others, and also of their victory.



The one who responded first was Liliana.



{To victory-!}



The lovely voice which was amplified with artifact echoed on the battlefield.



And then, the one who hailed at that voice with a blood soaked figure yet powerful yell was Gahard.



{To victory-!!}



Continuing after him, Karm, Adol, and Alfrerick yelled.



{To victory-!!!}



In that situation, the people’s heart was connecting to each other naturally.



――To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-!



A Loud chorus of victory resounded in the battlefield. It swallowed the rumbling of the space, numbed the ground, and reached to the heaven, the will of ‘human’ swept the darkness and rose up like the light of the sun.



Human, demi-human, human from another world, those classifications were irrelevant, yells for their victory, and then yells of their faith for the people fighting at the heavens, they were all repeated with impossibly beautiful harmony.



Amidst those, one person didn’t join the chorus and stared wholeheartedly to the sky, a black angel. It was Kaori who was looking forward to the return of Hajime and others believing in Miledy. She kept floating midair and continued to stare at the collapsing Holy Precincts as though she could see nothing else.



And, at that time, Kaori’s senses was caught by something.



The place was, around the sky at the collapsed God Mountain.



She returned to her senses in surprise and turned her gaze there. The space about eight kilometers above the God Mountain distorted like jelly, right after that an elliptical hole opened with a pop. It was a distance that normal human couldn’t perceive, the hole itself was also only as big as several people could go through it so nobody other than Kaori noticed it.



Driven by her premonition, Kaori flapped her jet black wings. At the same time, with *hyupo-!* silhouette of people flew out from that hole.



“Aa――!!”



“NuOOOOOO!!”



White and black shadows. Even from afar she understood that those were her comrades’ figures.



“Shia-, Tio!”



Kaori accelerated in one go. For some reason Shia and Tio were falling straight toward the ground without any sign of slowing down. Kaori became a black silver meteor that rushed through the sky.



Midway, Shizuku and others flew out in panic riding their skyboard from the hole Shia and Tio fell off from, but for now Kaori didn’t stop accelerating and rapidly approached the screaming two people.



And then, Kaori splendidly caught the two altogether a few dozen meters near the ground. Looking closer, near the ground there was a shining barrier deployed that seemed to come from Suzu so it really wasn’t that big of a matter.



“Shia, Tio! Welcome back-!”



“Fue, a, Kaori-san! I’m back desu!”



“Thou saved us, Kaori. Also, I’m back.”



Shia and Tio clung at Kaori’s arms midair while sighing in relieve. Kaori flapped her wings and landed gently on the ground, she then gently put down the two on the ground where they sat with a flop.



There, Shizuku, Suzu, Ryutaro, and Kouki landed down from the sky.



“Kaori!”



“Shizuku-chan!”



Shizuku got off the skyboard and leaped toward Kaori. Kaori too caught Shizuku.



“Kaoriiiin! I’m back!”



“Suzu-chan. Welcome back!”



“Yo-, looks like you are also safe huh.”



“Ryutaro-kun too, welcome back.”



Still hugging Shizuku, Kaori then welcomed Suzu and replied to Ryutaro’s words smilingly. And then, she abruptly showed a soft smile at Kaori who was looking a bit awkward.



“Kouki-kun, welcome back.”



“…Yeah, I’m back. Really, sorry, for everything. Truly, sorry. Also…thank you.”



He had attacked Kaori at the devil king castle, because of that Kouki had resolved himself to not receive words of greeting. But now tears were gathering at the corner of his eyes and his head looked down. He was absolutely grateful that Kaori didn’t forsake him just like Shizuku. Of course, he wouldn’t make misunderstanding anymore.



After nodding once at such Kouki, Kaori looked up to the sky. And then, her gaze moved around searching for something. It was obvious who she was searching for.



“Kaori-san…..Hajime-san and Yue-san are not together with us.”



“Shia…that’s”



“Don’t fret, Kaori. We only separated in the middle because it was necessary. Goshujin-sama and also Yue, they will cometh back without fail.”



“Tio…”



Tio called at Kaori who was looking uneasy admonishingly.



After Miledy came for them, Shia and others received Degraded Arrow of World Crossing from her which opened a hole in space and they leaped into it.



Naturally when they heard that Miledy would go to Hajime and Yue right after, everyone said that they would go together with her. Shia, Tio, and Shizuku were especially determined, their blazing eyes told that it was impossible for them to escape ahead.



However, Degraded Arrow of World Crossing was necessary to cross space, there was no spare for them to go to Hajime and Yue’s position. Although there were several arrows that were created because they were failed work, but different from the real thing these degraded versions could only be used once before breaking and on top of that it could only open the hole for a few seconds.



In addition, the size of the hole that could be opened by the arrow was limited. It was unthinkable that they would have the leeway to pass through the hole in turn under a few second in a world that was collapsing with increasing momentum. Thinking that Haijme and Yue would be added for their return home, in the worst case the situation might turn into one where they would need to choose who would escape and who would be left behind.



In the end, Shia and others had to escape first. They were really reluctant though. They could do nothing but understand when they were told that perhaps not all of them could go back if they accompanied Miledy. Besides, “I swear I’ll send Hajime and Yue back without fail” the state of Miledy when she promised that was unusually filled with determination, that was also a factor that pushed their back to escape first.



Even so, there was no way their worry toward Hajime and Yue who were still in the collapsing Holy Precincts could vanish, Shia and Tio also looked up wordlessly to the sky. Shizuku and others were also similarly praying while looking up to the sky.



At the battlefield, the people of the allied force were still resounding their prayer powerfully.



It was unclear how much time passed. It felt like an eternity, but surely not even dozens of minutes had passed.



It was at that time, that happened.



“Ah”



The one who spontaneously raised that voice was Kaori.



Shia and others, and then the allied force too, ahead of their gaze a pillar of light that was a mix of golden and crimson suddenly pierced the space and stabbed at the sky.



That torrent of magic power which couldn’t be expressed enough even with the word tremendous, and then, the undulation of the overwhelming will that was filled in it, caused the war cry of the battlefield to stop unconsciously. Everyone without exception gazed in enchantment at the dichromatic magic power which ascended to the sky in spiraling motion.



“Hajime-san! Yue-san!”



Shia yelled, with a voice that overflowed with joy.



Right after that, the golden and crimson magic power began to converge back like in a playback.



And then,



A scream of death agony reverberated in the world. Immediately after, although the volume wasn’t to the degree that tore the eardrum, but, that voice of the end was certainly heard by everyone throughout the world. Without any reason, anyone thought, that it was the blood flowing out from the god.



Before long, a muddy silver light was dispersing toward the empty sky, and silence returned to the world.



What happened now, in the middle of everyone thinking that with their breath caught, the distortion of space covering the sky and the collapsing world of heavens that was visible in it, suddenly, they were all shrinking toward one point. It was as though something was sucking them all, or possibly it was like they were all being compressed.



The next moment, the world of heavens that was gathered into a point scattered.



There was no sound.



There was merely several layers of ripples with a vibrant color like the blue sky, radiating silently. Unnoticed, the rumble(scream) that shook the world stopped, the scared trembling of the ground also stopped.



Ripples were spreading through the world.



Not only the color of the blue sky, the color of the evening or possibly sunrise, the color of the midday sun, the clear color of the moon, the color of vivacious plants, the color of powerful earth, the color of enveloping night, they all laid on top of each other.



The beautiful ripples of seven colors spread to the end of the earth, before long, cracks began to enter the dark red world. That change wasn’t something violent that gave the impression like the crumbling just now, but a gentle change that quietly repainted the world…



“Aa…god”



Someone whispered. That wasn’t a prayer that wished for salvation anymore. But merely something that came from the deep emotion filling the chest.



The world was recovering its color. It was a truly a splendorous scene that should be called as a legend.



The dark red world was shining sparklingly while becoming broken fragments.



The ripples of the sky were gradually weakening in intensity, however, they didn’t vanish, as though watching over the people who were silently shedding tears drops by drops, it became a rainbow aurora drifting in the air.



“Hajime-kun…Yue…”



Amidst those, a voice that leaked out from between the clenched teeth resounded. Kaori clenched her hand so tightly it was bleeding while glaring at the annihilated Holy Precincts.



“Hajime…”



“Nagumo-kun.”



“Shit-, what’s going on-, that idiot-“



“Nagumo-“



Shizuku, Suzu, Ryutaro, Kouki, they gritted their teeth while facing the sky with a grim gaze. Tio too was looking up at the sky with narrowed gaze without averting her eyes even for a moment.



The dark red world vanished.



The sun began to illuminate the world with its natural radiance.



They waited for a long time, but the figure of the people they waited for couldn’t be seen.



Before long, that fact became unbearable and Suzu whispered.



“…This is a lie, right”



Ryutaro gritted his teeth hard.



“Damnit-“



Kouki opened his mouth in a daze.



“Don’t tell me…both of them…really, won’t co――”



And then, when that worst assumption was going to be said half unconsciously…



“It’s alright desu-!!”



Such electrifying loud voice interrupted.



Kouki and others returned to their senses suddenly and moved their gaze there. Over there, was the figure of Shia, her rabbit ears standing straight while she looked straight to the sky.



Shia didn’t avert her eyes from the sky and spoke with a voice that was full of conviction.



“Right now, Hajime-san and Yue-san are together desu. That entangled golden and crimson magic power is the proof. As long as they are together, they are invincible!”



That was why, they would blow away a mere difficult situation like this and came back with a smile. Those words which contained Shia’s immense faith became a power of words that resounded in the world. (TN: Power of words or soul of language. Called kotodama in Japan, some kind of believe that words which were said have some kind of power in them.)



Mysteriously, the heart of the people who were driven by unease became light.



“…..Yep. That’s right. With those two together, I cannot imagine any difficult that cannot be smashed through.”



Kaori was in agreement. It wasn’t a voice that was blurred with unease like before, but a powerful voice filled with conviction like Shia.



“Truly. Surely if those two become serious, the word ‘fail’ will be erased from dictionary. Rather, perhaps they art busy flirting right now that they art late to come back.”



Tio jokingly said such thing. And as expected, the grimness in her face was taken away and changed into conviction.



“Isn’t that right. They might, no, they are absolutely flirting right now. This is their emotional reunion after all. Perhaps the matter of us is already thrown to the beyond by them.”



While smiling wryly, Shizuku nodded thinking that it was probably the case. The way they talked also softened the expression of Suzu and others.



Right after that, as though to proof that the words of Shia and others were correct…



“Ah…fufu, see-“



Shia pointed her finger.



Over there was naturally…



Part 3



The rainbow aurora hanging in the sky. A small hole was opened between the veil.



“Uoh”



“…Nn-“



A silhouette of two people glued close to each other flew out from there along with shocked voice. It went without saying, they were Hajime and Yue.



Hajime firmly held Yue tightly with his one arm, Yue too also circled her hands around Hajime’s neck, clinging to him.



Like that, *gou-gou* while feeling the howling of wind on their ear, the two of them began freefalling leaving it to the gravity.



Based on the height it would be thirty seconds until the ground.



Hajime who was falling with his face up saw the mystical aurora they were rapidly distanced from and the distance to the ground that he confirmed by looking across his shoulder and instantly calculated. It seemed that the place they were going to impact was a spot slightly distanced from the allied force.



“Yue, can you fly?”



“…Impossible. Magic power was used up from the arrow’s activation.”



“Well, I guess that’s true. It’s going to be a bit rough, so hold on tight.”



“…Nn. I catch you. I absolutely won’t let go.”



“…”



While experiencing a skydiving without a parachute, Hajime and Yue conversed filled with composure like that. Listening and seeing Yue’s bewitching voice and gaze from very near like this, it couldn’t be helped that Hajime’s words got caught in his throat.



While being exposed against awful wind pressure midair, Hajime ignored his slightly ringing eardrum to the best of his ability and then rolled his stance while still holding Yue. And then, his body became clad in faint crimson magic power. With that he somehow controlled his badly balanced one armed body that was toyed around by the wind.



Although he had drunk recovery medicine, but the healed amount was insignificant. In the first place there was the effect from the depth of the damage he received and the creation of the concept magic that caused his magic power recovery to be slow. There was also a limit to the number of times he could use ‘Air Force’.



While he was controlling his posture, he had to land down on the ground by perfectly dropping his speed. Honestly speaking, the ‘Air Force’ could only be used for ten-odd times more, furthermore, in his current condition that could only use ‘Air Force’ which couldn’t be said to be displaying its complete effect, making a skydiving from altitude of several kilometers to succeed was nothing but a superhuman feat but…



“So the end is me skydiving with Yue huh…it’s not bad.”



Hajime said such thing. Something of this degree wasn’t even a danger.



Hajime gently straightened up his body. Immediately a crimson ripple spread below his feet, it collapsed instantly. However, he was definitely decelerating. He repeated that.



The people of the allied force also noticed them. Crimson ripples were spreading and scattering many times from between the aurora, and silhouette of people was descending like a comet.



At that moment, a deeply emotional voice resounded. The voice of the goddess.



{Thi, this is our, victory-!}



A beat.



――oOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!



At the battlefield, no, at the new world the people raised shouts of joy that sounded like an explosion.



As though to reply to that cry of triumph that was like the first cry of a newborn raised by the world, glittering light particles were raining down from the rainbow aurora covering the sky. The light of the sun that recovered its radiance shined, making the world to gleam like a diamond. Surely that was the blessing toward the new world.



Amidst the raining shower of light, Hajime kicked on the last ripple and splendidly reduced his speed, he kept embracing Yue and landed on the ground. Even so, the wounds on his both legs still weren’t healed, using ‘Air Force’ also finally exhausted the magic power for his recovery, so like that he collapsed limply on the ground with his face up.



“Haha-, the finishing is totally messed up.”



Hajime wryly smiled while lying down with his body unable to even twitch. His expression somehow looked refreshed.



Yue who was embraced all that time then straddled Hajime and flopped down on top of him in a tight embrace, and then with a really close distance where it looked like their face could touch each other anytime, Yue shook her small head while staring at Hajime.



“…Not messed up. It was the coolest.”



“Is that so?”



“…Nn. Hajime, thank you. I love you.”



Like that, with bewitching and melting smile, Yue pushed those soft and sweet lips on Hajime’s.



Yue enjoyed to her heart’s content Hajime who could only lie spread-eagled without being able to move, where he could only let Yue do whatever she wanted to him. Although, even if he was able to move, but if this was what Yue wished for then there was no way for Hajime to resist.



Yue’s appearance was still in her adult form. Although the charm that was brought about from the gap between her external appearance and her mental age had gone, now she was emitting sensual pheromone from her whole body, perhaps the brutality of her sex appeal had increased instead with this.



Her adult appearance was most likely due to metamorphosis magic. In that case, perhaps when her magic power recovered she would be able to change between woman and girl appearance freely. It felt like he could see the future where he was toyed around by Yue’s demand. Although, Yue’s heart was also captured by Hajime to the same degree with his heart captured by her though.



The endless kiss erased even the cheering of the allied force, forming a world of only the two of them.



But, a voice that the two couldn’t ignore reverberated into that world.



“Aa――! As expected you two are flirting! You two don’t even care about other people’s feeling! No rather than that, Yue-san is…”



“She is turning aduuuuult! Yue is attacking Hajime-kun with adult charm!’



“Humm. Just as expected. No, the adult appearance art outside expectation though…let see, how about I join too.”



“Uu-, what amazing sensuality…bu, but there is no option for retreating! A maiden can only charge ahead!”



Shia, Kaori, Tio, and Shizuku, those four people. Behind them Suzu, Ryutaro, and Kouki also rushed to here.



With a lively state that was unthinkable for a deeply moving reunion, Shia and others leaped at Hajime. Yue who separated her lips saying “I’m back” got dragged into it, and Hajime became piled with beautiful women and beautiful girls.



And then, hearing the words “welcome back” filled with a flood of emotions from their mouths, Hajime also spoke “I’m back” like Yue.



Diamond dust rained down from the sky, making the world to sparkle. Around him were the important people with teary eyes and joyful smiling like blooming flower. From afar, he could feel many existences that dashed toward here while calling his name.



The warm enveloping him, the welling up senses of accomplishment, and then the content feeling, caused Hajime to smile. It was a mysterious smile where fearlessness and gentleness were entwined tightly…



While that smile of ‘Nagumo Hajime’ caused a tightening to happen inside the girls’ chest, Hajime entrusted his body to a pleasant fatigue and slowly closed his eyes.





Chapter 178




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



Epilogue



Legendary Great War.



The people naturally called the battle like that, a month had passed since that decisive battle where the fate of the world was staked.



After that decisive battle, the gates that were set up at every place were opened once more and the voices of a lot of people that celebrated their reunion and victory filled the prairie in front of the capital.



A few days after that, although there was some chaos due to the healing of the wounded, the confirmation and burial of the deceased, and the annihilation of the capital which caused the people to lose their place, due to the hard work of every representative that worked together for a common cause, the post-treatment of the war was carried out relatively smoothly.



Due to the collapsed God Mountain, the Hairihi kingdom capital was also destroyed by getting swallowed into it, the non-combatant that was unable to participate in the legendary great war――especially the craftsmen were wholly mobilized for the reconstruction, in addition the merchants and the common citizens also gave their maximum support and the work which caused the progress to move rapidly. On top of using magic, there was also the good will and proactiveness of the people all over the world which crossed over race or country to reconstruct the capital, it was to the degree that they calculated the capital might be able to recover its former appearance within half a year.



At the prairie where fierce ravages of the battle remained, using the wreckage of the fortress a lot of temporary residences were established that were mainly used for the people that engaged in the reconstruction to lodge at. There, kitchen and inn, general store and the likes were created one after another, to the degree that it might possibly turn into a part of the capital by linking it with the city's expansion. Surely, the city would become even livelier even compared to when it had the God Mountain behind it.



The temporary establishment of the holy church was also created in that temporary housing town.



At that battle, the story was that the enemy was an evil god that pretended to be the god Ehitorujue, so the people still had their heart supported by the holy church which worshiped Ehito as a god. Although the God Mountain and the holy church's headquarter had disappeared, but suddenly taking away that support would only make the people uneasy.



Having said that, for the people who knew the truth, they felt more than a little reluctance for the holy church to keep using the name Ehitorujue exactly as it was until now.



There with the speech of the 'Goddess of Harvest' Aiko, this kind of story was dispatched to the world.



It said, that the true name of god Ehito was Ehicliberei, for a long time the mad god――Ehitorujue had stolen this true name.



It said, that the 'rebels' or rather the 'liberators' who knew about the danger to the world from Ehito once challenged the mad god in order to regain the pure faith, but because of the mad god's foul play, they were unable to defeat him.



It said, that in order to grant their own power to people who could possibly defeat Ehito, the liberators slept at the bottom of the great labyrinths. And then, the chosen people who were summoned from another world by god were awarded this power. Aiko was the spokesman of these people, while the person who received the most power was the 'Goddess's Sword'.



It said, like that Hajime and others splendidly defeated the mad god Ehitorujue that was hiding in Holy Precincts. However, due to the last resistance of the mad god Ehitorujue, it caused a collapse in order to take along the world to accompany him in his death. In response to that, the last liberator――Miledy Raisen who made her soul to possess a golem and had watched over the people all this time, she exchanged her soul for the world's salvation.



A complete lie, it was not. The story matched the gist of the truth. By the way, the name Ehicliberei was a coined word with the meaning of 'seven liberators' put into it. It was the consideration for them that they would surely felt unpleasant to have the story of them cooperating with Ehitorujue to be taught to the future generations. If it was asked whose consideration it was, then it must be the one who thought of this story which was not a lie but also not the truth which was complicated in various meaning, a certain white haired eye-patched man somewhere.



Due to this speech of Aiko, the historians who were excited to leave this time's legendary great battle's record in writing at once raised the name of Miledy and others to the front stage of history once more as the seven great wise men who saved the world.



Regarding the new top brass of the church, it was composed of the priests of the remote region. The people who participated in the choir squad at that battlefield and managed to survive became the core of this new top brass. Most of them were people who clashed with the central church and then got exiled to the remote region, so their thought and ideology were also exceedingly sensible, many of them were a man of character so it was thought that there wouldn't be any particular problem.



Regarding Raisen Great Labyrinth that was left behind by Miledy, Hajime created a living golem as the replacement of Miledy Raisen and stationed it there. It was equipped with gatling cannon, missile pod, and even pile bunker, so the difficulty level might be jumped up there.



Hajime didn't particularly do anything to the other great labyrinths. Perhaps it had no more meaning, but his stance was that if anyone searched for power and wanted to challenge it then just challenged it.



Regarding Hajime's quality artifacts that were lavishly used at the legendary great war, after Hajime awoke from fainting, he destroyed all of them. Gahard and some other people yelled "Stooop―!" while clinging to him, but Hajime turned everything into garbage right in front of their eyes. Hajime created an artifact to gather all artifacts that had his stamp, so there wouldn't any that got overlooked.



Of course, the artifacts that Kam and others of Hauria possessed were left alone in their possession, though Haijme applied various work on those first.



It was irritating for Hajime when Gahard's resentful eyes, or rather the eyes that looked like a child whose important toys were taken away were staring fixedly at him, so while he was at it Hajime gifted him with a small version Fernier. And at the next day, for some reason Hajime became the best friend of his majesty the emperor. It seemed that Gahard was really pleased with Fernier.



In preparation of the worst case that Gahard used Fernier to invade another country, Hajime made Liliana and Karm carry the remote switch for the self-exploding artifact. If Gahard knew of this…just what kind of face he would make. Hajime was really curious about it but with an effort, he endured to not ask.



Regarding the relationship between demi-human and human race, not only the people from the empire, the other humans were also in the process of changing their feeling toward the demi-human with whom they had fought together with through the legendary great war. As expected the fact that they had entrusted their lives to each other was enough to repaint their discriminatory view.



Of course, if it was asked if the two side could immediately join shoulders together, it wouldn't be that easy, but even so, none was holding animosity to the degree where they could act hatefully with recklessness. There was also how they had witnessed the gallant effort of the dragon race, and above all else, there was the fact that a rabbit-eared girl and a dragon woman were among the comrades of the savior hero who stormed into the Holy Precincts.



The demi-human weren't called as the abandoned race that didn't possess god's blessing anymore. Rather, it was obvious that the two demi-human would leave their page in history as a great person that stood side by side with the hero. No word of contempt could possibly be directed to such people.



Due to such reason, the social status of demi-human was beginning to be reevaluated rapidly among the human without anyone even needed to do particularly anything. As one part of that process, the holy church wouldn't call them as 'demi-human race' anymore, from now on they would formally name them as 'beastman race', the official notice for that had been created.



Because of that too, the 'Necklace of Pledge' that had been attached on the royalty of the empire had also been dismantled. After reaching this stage with great pain where it might be possible for an amicable coexistence, to keep holding the life of the empire royalty would only break the 'equal relationship', causing a halt at the compromise between the two side.



Although, just because of that didn't mean that there was no more guarantee from the empire side to stop the persecution to the demi-human and making them a slave.



"Meteor and sunlight laser, or fully equipped Hauria, which one is better?"



At the occasion where the 'Necklace of Pledge' was dismantled, Gahard asked "Do you believe that the empire won't move for revenge?" with a fearless grin, and the sentence that Hajime gave back to him was that. It went without saying that after that all the close aides of Gahard swiftly demanded for a handshake of friendship. The empire was based on strength supremacy doctrine…



Now then, talking about equality between races there was the matter of the devil race.



They were invited into Holy Precincts and made to sleep at the lower strata domain, but for some reason they escaped the collapse of Holy Precincts and got thrown out at the wasteland at the outskirt of the devil race capital which was far away from the battlefield, after that they were discovered there still continuing to fast asleep.



Even at the present a month after the battle, that situation still hadn't changed. Most likely they could be awoken immediately if regeneration magic was used on them, but right now everyone was busy with the post-battle treatment and rebuilding, there was really no leeway to wake up the existences that could possibly become a seed of conflict, so now they were sealed at a corner of the devil capital under strict monitoring. The seal was using Hajime's artifact.



By the way, regarding the devil race people who were deeply carved with the terror of Hajime at the devil king castle, Hajime only said a word of "troublesome" and put them to sleep too. It would be troubling if they said something like 'We are going to save our brethren!' and rampaged, so Hajime quickly took measures.



Although, for them who had been planted with a lot of terror by Hajime, and furthermore, after they knew that Hajime had even accomplished the destruction of God Mountain and godslaying, it was really unthinkable that they would do anything stupid.



Now then, Hajime and others had busily moved around doing things like the kingdom capital reconstruction, the artifacts' withdrawal, driving in the wedge to the empire, fabricating history, restoring the honor of the liberators, and various other things, but that didn't mean that they were lending their hand in this and that of this world because of mere whim or sophistication.



Naturally their first objective was to return home to the birthplace earth――Japan.



During this one month, they continued to stay in this world and moved around was also doubling as killing time, and that was merely because they couldn't go home. Having said that, it didn't mean that they didn't have the method to go home or anything, and it wasn't also because they were unable to create the concept magic.



The reason was simple. There was no material to create the 'Compass of Guidance' and 'Crystal Key'.



Concept magic was powerful. Even though Hajime was able to enchant mineral, but using average material would cause the item to explode when activated because it wouldn't be able to endure the effect. Before the difficult undertaking that was crossing the world, they didn't want to take any risky venture like 'It should be usable if used only for one time!'



Besides, even though they were taking along Myuu and Remia together, but as expected Hajime wanted to prepare a return path home to this world for them, regarding Shia and Tio too, Karm and Adol and many other people were remaining in this world, Hajime thought that they would want to go home here sometimes to meet with their family.



And so, an artifact that would break after just one-time use would be troubling for that.



Having said that, speaking about a mineral that could endure concept magic and also had high affinity with magic, Hajime couldn't think of anything else but the god crystal. But, they had finished confirming that there was no god crystal anymore at the abyss. Now that they didn't have the compass, it wasn't realistic to search for god crystal around the world when there was not even any guarantee that it existed.



And the idea that Hajime got when thinking of that, was that if it didn't exist then he just needed to create it.



God crystal was the crystallization of magic power where magic power accidentally piled up for a long time of a thousand years. It was the solidification of the magic power of nature that was so vast it was absurd. The process was like water drops that bore a hole on a rock.



But, Hajime had no interest at all in staring at water drops boring a hole into a rock. Therefore, he just needed to twist such theory with foul play.



And then what he did based on that was creating an artifact that converged natural magic element in high speed using gravity magic which was a magic that interfered with the power of star, and then he used space magic which was a magic that interfered with boundary to pump the gathered natural magic element into artifact(pool of human population magic power).



Added with that, with Hajime who was a possessor of inhuman magic power as the first in the list, the otherworlder cheat group pumped in their magic power every day into the artifact.



As the result, after a month passed, they succeeded in creating a god crystal with diameter around fifteen centimeters. It only had around half the size of the god crystal that Hajime first discovered and it also didn't produce 'God Water', but it was still an amazing material that could endure concept magic satisfactorily.



And then, finally, today Hajime started making 'Compass of Guidance' and 'Crystal Key'.



The place was the fountain plaza at the outskirt of Fea Belgen. It was that place where Shia's feeling came to a realization. Hajime and others, in this one month they were using this Fea Belgen which was the easiest place to spend time in as their base, so Aiko and the classmates were also staying here. They were human, but the beastmen were in great joy with the hero party's stay there.



At the plaza, Shia and Tio, Kaori and Shizuku, and then Myuu and Remia were there. Other than them all the classmates had also gathered to look at the moment when the artifact for going home was completed. In addition, Liliana, Karm, and everyone else from Hauria clan and others were also there.



"Yosh, let's do this Yue."



"…Nn-"



Hajime and Yue were facing each other at the center of the plaza. Yue's appearance now was her original girl figure. Sometimes she also turned into adult mode depending on her mood of the day, but this girl mode was used a lot because it was convenient for sitting on Hajime's lap or getting hugged.



Hajime too now had his new artificial arm and eye back, the vampirization from Yue was also undone. Until they returned to earth, Hajime planned to get his hair turned black and coated his artificial arm with skin and so forth, as much as possible he wanted to return to his original appearance.



The excessively lovely Yue whose body was wrapped with chic goth loli outfit and Hajime were closing their eyes in concentration with the god crystal between them.



The classmates who were watching over them at the surrounding gulped.



In such atmosphere, the ceremony of concept creation finally began.



Inside the forest of Fea Bergen, golden and crimson magic power calmly began to twist up. From the beginning the magic power of two colors was spiraling while mixing with each other, it looked as though the two color was getting intimate with each other.



Before long the leaves of the trees were blown and scattered around while a torrent of magic power was climbing to the sky, a clear will began to reside in it. Regardless that it was unseen by eye, everyone who was there felt it, an overwhelming will that made the skin to have goosebump.



At the same time, the god crystal began to shine. The stormy torrent of magic power was focused and absorbed into the god crystal with amazing force.



Calmly, yet sonorously Hajime spoke the power of words.



"――'Transmute'"



Immediately the god crystal split into two. The ores other than god crystal that had been prepared beforehand instantly mixed and they were forming shape.



Unnoticed the stormy magic power was shining like a star between Hajime and Yue, the forest of Fea Bergen and the surrounding people were illuminated, their heart was charmed by the spectacle.



That radiance was also getting smaller bit by bit. "Hou" Here and there a sigh of admiration was leaked. It was unclear whether the cause of that was because of the artifact's creation, or else if it was because Hajime and Yue who created this miraculous spectacle while snuggling close to each other.



And then, the light finally settled down, Yue and Hajime quietly opened their eyes. Ahead of their gaze was a compass and crystal key that were sparkling bright.



"…Hajime. Test it."



"Okay."



Yue said that while separating their hand gently. Obeying that, Hajime tried activating the compass. There was no problem, it seized the location of earth intuitively. And then the crystal key was also operating on space properly.



"O, oi, Nagumo. How is it? Everything fine?"



Endo Kousuke asked timidly after becoming unable to endure the tension. By the way, Kousuke who had received an amazing nickname from Hauria clan, and got a lover from the same rabbit clan (in this one month he had worked very hard. Especially he paid a lot of compensation with his shame while mass producing dark history of his life), now he had a lot of common point with Haijme, the two of them were unexpectedly getting along and in this one month they were building a relatively familiar relationship.



Looking at Hajime who reacted to Kousuke's call, several of the classmates gulped loudly.



Hajime ran his gaze around the classmates whose expression was stiffening from nervousness.



And then, he grinned widely and wordlessly gave a thumb up. The meaning of that was obvious.



"Yossha―――!!"



"Hurraay!!"



"UOOOOOOO, we can go home! We seriously can go home!!"



"Nagumoo, no, you are Nagumo-sama already! Really thank you!"



"Fueeeeeeeen, I'm really glaaadd. Nagumo-kuuun, Yue-saaan, thank you!"



"Hajime-samaaa, please make me your slaveeeeee!"



"Yue-san, make me your peeet!"



Joyful cheers exploded, words of thanks rose one after another. It felt like there were some dangerous words mixed in, but it would be troubling if perverts came out even from among the classmates so Hajime beautifully ignored it. But, the guy who made a strange request to Yue would be strangled later, while making that vow, Hajime sat down with a thud from fatigue.



Yue also sat on his lap in a tired state. He circled his arms around her slender waist to support her and then she snuggled in real close.



There, *sutetete―* cute footsteps resounded.



"Papaaa!"



"Myuu"



Hajime skillfully caught Myuu's small body that jumped energetically and placed her on the knee opposite of Yue with his support. As expected, Myuu was also snuggling in real close on him.



"Hajime-san! Me toooo"



Shia jumped *pyon* like a rabbit. The place that she embraced was Hajime's right shoulder. His hand that was supporting Yue temporarily let go and patted Shia's rabbit ear. Shia happily snuggled close to him.



"Hajime-kun, you did it."



The one who was saying that while quietly snuggling close was Kaori. And it wasn't with an apostle body. Now she was in her original body. Thinking of the difference of lifespan between her and Hajime and others, it would be better if she stayed inside apostle body. Kaori herself thought that, but Yue who had comprehended the secret technique of apostle creation during the time she was possessed by Ehito said that it was possible someday to turn Kaori's body into apostle and surpassed the limit of her lifespan, so in the end Kaori returned to her original body. In actuality, she was already able to change into apostle mode temporarily, where in that state she was able to use silver wings and disintegration ability and also handled twin swords art.



That Kaori clung tightly on Hajime's left shoulder. When she got her head patted, as expected she then snuggled close to him.



"Goshujin-sama's world is surely fun isn't it?"



"Surely you will be shocked by it there."



Tio and Shizuku arrived. There was only the back that was left open. The gaze of the two crossed. A spark scattered between them. When they were about to aim at the last clinging position…



"My my, a good place is left open here. Ufufu. Dear, please excuse me."



Remia who smoothly cut in clung tightly to Hajime's back. " "Aa-" " Tio and Shizuku's voice was raised. As expected from a widow. She couldn't be made light of.



"Shia-san, haa haa, let's get along well with me?"



"Gee, Altina-!"



Unnoticed Altina appeared behind Shia with her breathing getting rough "haa haa". She was walking unsteadily like a zombie while approaching Shia's back to cling there.



Shia whose rabbit ears stood tall with shudders running through them separated from Hajime to repel back Altina.



To take advantage of that opening, two more female approached with a jog…



"…Aiko-san? What could you possibly be planning to do?"



"Liliana-san yourself, what business do you have with him?"



Here too sparks were sparking off.



Hajime's surrounding became noisy suddenly, even the classmates who cheered joyfully with each other began to notice the commotion.



Amidst all that, Yue sighed "fuu" toward the female camp who was noisily quarreling for Hajime. Hajime tilted his head asking "What's wrong?" with his gaze, immediately after that Yue's atmosphere changed from sweet to bewitching.



And then, Yue's body shined flashily, and at the next moment, the adult version Yue appeared. Right after that, the adult version Yue easily tore off Kaori and Remia from Hajime, because of the sudden growth the length of the clothes became comparatively short, and with that amazingly risqué and seductive clothing, she hugged Hajime's head onto her breast and Hajime's head was buried *munyuu!* into those splendid twin hills.



The quarreling female camp raised "Ah" voice while Hajime leaked out a muffled voice "unmu-". Myuu was still supported in one of Hajime's arms.



"…By the legal wife's authority, the noisy child will be prohibited."



Gushing out sex appeal. The devilish beauty that would charm anyone without distinction of sex. The words of the adult mode Yue that was the personification of bewitching made everyone's breath taken away. The female camp immediately tried to object, but when they were forestalled by the sidelong glance Yue sent them, immediately their cheeks reddened and their words "uu" got caught inside their throat. Even Yue's self-acknowledged rival Kaori was like that. Speaking clearly there was no one that could go against Yue.



By the way, if it was asked what was the prohibition was referring to, it was referring at the permission to enter Hajime's bedroom. In this one month, Hajime and Yue, and then Shia too had passed through several sleepless nights, but that was something that didn't happen every day.



And then, even at night where Yue and Shia were not there, there were still women that warmed Hajime's bed. It went without saying just who those women were. And it also went without saying just who was the one that was holding the baton of command. It could be easily guessed from the words 'legal wife authority'.



"…Nn. As punishment, I will monopolize today."



"Wai-, Yue, umu-!?"



Hajime who became gutless from getting buried in the twin hills, was raised up by Yue and at the same time he received a hot, and not just normal hot but a scalding hoooot kiss from Yue.



The female camp suddenly became noisy. And then, the classmates were also became overdosed with sweetness and got flustered (including a part of the female students who became excited in a dangerous sense).



Kaori and others raised a voice of protest and pleading toward Hajime and Yue whose lips separated with rough gasping.



"Tha, that's not fair, Yue! I too with Hajime-kun…" (Kaori)



"E, err, me too…with Hajime…" (Shizuku)



"Goshujin-sama, please be with me." (Tio)



"My my, dear, please take care of me too okay?" (Remia)



"Hau, Na, Nagumo-kun, me, me too…" (Aiko)



"Hajime-san…please…" (Liliana)



In addition, Shia who had just finished burying Altina to the ground with a backdrop was wordlessly sending Hajime a moist gaze. Myuu was tilting her head because she was not really understanding what was going on.



There, Yue opened her mouth while smiling softly.



"…Hajime. With whom you will do it?"



If Hajime was mischievously asked that by Yue, then his answer could only be one.



"Yue is the only option."



"Kufuh…then, I'll be kidnapping him."



Saying that, Myuu was then enveloped gently by the wind and handed over to Remia, then Yue's figure vanished with a whoosh while still embracing Hajime. It was the magic 'Heaven Existence' that Yue ripped off from Ehitorujue. In truth when Yue kissed Hajime she recovered by taking Hajime's blood.



The plaza of Fea Bergen was once more filled with the protesting voices "Aaa――!!" of the female camp that was in love with Hajime.



"…God damnit. I'm so deathly jealous."



"Yeah. Me too, I want to get kidnapped by that kind of beautyyy"



"But, this me who is feeling that if it's Nagumo then it can't be helped, it feels like I already lost something."



Tamai Atsushi looked up to the sky and whispered, while Aikawa Noboru was earnestly in agreement, Nimura Akito shrugged and exposed an expression that couldn't say anything.



"Aa, I totally understand you. It feels like I cannot make any word."



"'Well, it's Nagumo after all', this sentence is the recent popular phrase huh…"



Nomura Kentaro and Nagayama Juugo that heard the conversation of Tamai and others were smiling wryly while nodding. To that Nakano Shinji and Saito Yoshiki also made a dry smile that similarly couldn't say anything.



"Haa haa, I want to be stepped on by Yue-san. I want to get ground down hard while getting scorned by those eyes…"



"You are going to the hospital right away after we go home okay? Have them look at your head."



Amidst a part of the boys that were turning perverted, the other boys were smiling wryly while feeling envious and understanding, while also feeling complicated because they could be that understanding.



Nearby those boys, Miyazaki Nana was similarly leaking out a voice was filled with envy.



"How enviouuusss"



Sonobe Yuuka who tilted her head asked back "Which one that you mean?"



"Rather than which one, I think I'm more envious of that kind of relationship itself."



"I really get what you mean. Certainly that's envious isn't it?"



Sugawara Taeko was making a girly expression while leaking out an admiring sigh "hou". Yuuka smiled wryly toward her two best friends that didn't even hide their longing while staring at the demon king harem members who were rushing into the forest to chase after the vanishing Yue and Hajime before she opened her mouth.



"How should I put it, Kaori-chan and Shizuku who stepped into that relationship, and then Ai-chan who got over various things, they are amazing."



"…What's with you all, getting like this. Crap, Nagumo-kun is seriously demon king-sama."



"Haa haa, Hajime-samaaa, please make me your slave…"



"Let's go to the hospital together when we go home. You need to get your head looked at."



The conversations of the girl classmates came into hearing too, they expressed their feeling that envied Hajime and Yue's relationship, while also giving their praise at Kaori and others who entered the harem. At the same time, their cheeks reddened from knowing that the harem already did it. Actually, quite a number of them harbored the feeling that if Hajime asked for them then they would respond to him. But Hajime wasn't asking for them, so those feelings didn't come into realization though.



"Suzu is not going after them?"



"No no, I'm not going. Just what are you saying so suddenly, Ryutaro-kun?"



Suzu was staring at the progression of the commotion while cackling, to such Suzu, Ryutaro who was at her side asked her that for some reason, to which Suzu tilted her head as though to say "Just what is this person talking about?"



"…No, if you ain't going then that's fine. See, your inside is a perverted old man yeah, so I thought that somehow you would get carried away saying 'me too' and charged into there or something."



"…Oi, are you calling me a pervert without integrity, you bastard. I wonder, do I actually need to have a talk with Ryutaro-kun regarding your impression of me?"



"No, because, you see, fundamentally you are a pervert after all…"



"Okay, you are asking for a fight right? You want to fight aren't you? I'll let you eat to your heart's content you know, this evolved Barrier Burst of mine."



Ryutaro scratched his cheek lightly while speaking his honest opinion, hearing that a vein appeared on Suzu's forehead while her hand reached toward her restored iron fan. Looking at that, Kouki rushed in panic to stop her.



"Su, Suzu. Calm down-. Ryutaro doesn't mean anything bad with what he said, rather――"



"Kouki-kun shut up. This muscle brain who had forgotten the concept of delicacy inside her mother's stomach, he had to get talked strictly with at least once!"



Suzu cut off Kouki's words and howled fiercely. However, if Suzu talked about him until that far, then it would make Ryutaro wanted to at least object.



"Oy you! I don't want to be told that I get no delicacy or whatever by the girl who wanted to go peeking at the bedroom of Nagumo and others at the middle of the night! You yourself, you actually had thrown away this thing called a woman's shame at the roadside around there ain't you?"



"Tha, that's, because! I just got bothered! This is the love affair of one-sama and others you know!? It will be a loss of your life if we don't burn that scene into our eyes at least once you know!?"



"Who give a damn! Besides, if you want to see it that much then you can just go alone. Think about my feeling who got woken up at night and got taken along to peep!"



"That was my kindness to the no good Ryutaro-kun! Understand that!"



"Don't bullshit! Something like getting invited by a girl of the same age, to peek at the ero scene of the classmates, there is a limit even to being awkward! Or rather I don't get what you mean!"



The giant and tiny girl quarreled(?) noisily *gyaa gyaa*. The surrounding sent lukewarm gaze at the two who recently caused this kind of spectacle relatively often. And then, the gazes toward Kouki who was completely flustered around the two was also lukewarm.



The shining charisma when they were first summoned here was already gone, in this one month, Kouki had earnestly lowered his head to everyone and his former impressive presence was thoroughly disappearing. The gaze of the surrounding to him was still cold, filled with wariness and suspicion. Kouki who had resolved himself was merely accepting those emotions silently.



His expression was constantly hard, smeared with guilt and regret. The classmates who knew the former Kouki who always helped people without distinction, although at first they held suspicion at Kouki who betrayed them, but seeing Shizuku and others who had staked their lives to take him back, and their own feeling who simply didn't want to lose anymore classmate, and then looking at Kouki who felt more regretful than anyone else, working hard trying to change himself, caused the classmates to try to accept him for the moment.



Kouki who lost his former smile, but at the side of Ryutaro and others, he was showing a slightly soft expression even while looking flustered, seeing that expression made the classmates feel a bit relieved. Because even though they had lost a lot of things, but somehow, the important thing from before they were summoned was coming back for a little bit, they felt such feeling from that expression.



With the commotion of Ryutaro and Suzu as the center, coupled with the confirmation that they could go home, the classmates also started making a ruckus with a bright expression.



The smiles of them who knew firsthand that in life, there were times where they had to fight with their life on the line…were really powerful.



Now then, if it was asked where were Hajime and Yue who teleported went….currently both of them were under the great tree. Hajime asked for a place where no one would intrude and also had a tasteful atmosphere, so this was the designated place that fulfilled both conditions.



Hajime was holding hand with Yue who went back into girl mode, their fingers interlocked with each other, the two of them were relaxedly walking toward the base of the great tree.



The weather today was clear, sunlight brightly poured down through the trees in this place where mist didn't enter.



"Yue, use regeneration magic."



"…Nn? Understood."



If the entrance to the great labyrinth was closed, then the great tree would return into a dead tree. Presently, the great tree in front of their eyes was withered. If regeneration magic was applied, it would recover its green color. Yue understood that, but she didn't understand why it was necessary when they had no plan to enter inside.



Yue tilted her head with slight doubt, but she somehow guessed that Hajime was merely wishing to see a more beautiful scenery, she smiled while applying the magic.



Instantly the great tree was overflowed with green while emitting light. The sunlight that shined through the branches and leaves were creating several angel’s ladders. If the tranquil atmosphere was combined with the splendorous great tree that could be associated with the world tree Yggdrasil in myth, the place would become something beautiful that was even more fantastical, or even mystical.



Hajime nodded in satisfaction before he took Yue's hand and led her to the base of the great tree. And then, like that he sat down and put Yue on his lap. It was a posture where he was embracing her from behind. The Yue in girl mode settled snugly on Hajime's chest.



While feeling each other's warmth and pulse for a while, they tasted the silence. The sound of leaves rustling that was audible sometimes and the breeze that caressed the skin felt pleasant.



Before long, after enjoying the nature enough to their heart's content, Hajime softly opened his mouth, whispering into Yue's ear.



"Yue."



"…Hm?"



"There is something I want to show you."



"…Something to show?"



"Yeah. Actually, this is something that should be shown to you faster but…it's something important so I was looking for a good timing, but it got postponed until the end like this. Sorry."



"…? I don't really understand but, if Hajime thinks that now is the right time, then that's fine."



Hajime's eyes softened at Yue who looked up from his chest to stare at him. And then, he kissed softly at her beautiful golden threads that rustled in the wind while taking out an artifact.



That was a small transparent ore that looked like a diamond. The image recording artifact that he discovered at the sealing room in the abyss.



Hajime kept embracing Yue tightly and lifted the artifact forward before activating it. The artifact shined, and suddenly an image was projected. Seeing the person that appeared there, Yue opened her eyes wide in shock and murmured in a daze.



"…Oji, sama?"



Hajime wordlessly strengthened his arms that were embracing Yue. It was unclear whether it was unconsciously or consciously, but Yue was also gripping tightly the hands of Hajime around her waist.



In front of those two, the person in the image recording――Yue's uncle, Denreed Gardia Wesperitirio Avatar slowly began to talk.



{…Aleytia. Long time no see, I wonder if saying that is a little wrong. I think that you are surely hating me. No, surely word like hate will not be enough at all. What I did……aa, that's not it. This is not what I want to say. Even though I have been thinking of various things, now that the time has come to leave my last will I cannot speak smoothly.}



While making a self-depreciating wry smile, Denreed pulled himself together by clearing his throat.



{That's right. First let me say my thanks. …Aleytia. Surely, right now on your side there should be someone who you are trusting from the bottom of your heart. At the very least, that person must be a strong person who could obtain metamorphosis magic and able to challenge the true Orkus, a person who didn't abandon you from the guardian that I prepared and rescued you.}



Hajime's eyes were closed. As though to listen to those words, or possibly to lament the departed.



{…You. You there who is close to my beloved niece. I wonder if you are male? Or else are you female? For Aleytia, what kind of existence are you? Are you her lover? Are you her friend? Or do you become her family, or her comrade? My apologize that I cannot meet you directly to say my thanks, but I still want to say it no matter what. …Thank you. For saving this child, for being close to her, thank you. I offer you my greatest gratitude in my whole lifetime.}



Yue didn't even twitch. What Hajime could see were only her glittering golden threads that were sparkling from reflecting light.



{Aleytia. Surely many questions are flooding inside your chest. Or else, perhaps you have already know the truth. Just why, that day, I hurt you, and buried you inside that bottom of darkness? What kind of existence are you, and who is your true enemy?}



The story that was talked from there was the facts that they already knew and speculation that didn't miss from the truth.



Namely, that Yue was born as a miko (TN: Usually miko is a shrine maiden, but from the kanji it can be interpreted as god child), and she was aimed by Ehitorujue. Denreed who noticed that pretended to kill Yue in his coup d'etat with the disguise that he was blinded by greed, he then sealed her in the abyss, the room where she was sealed itself was a hidden place that could fool even the god. The sealing of Yue was also a bitter choice for him so that her presence couldn't be possibly detected even for a bit.



{I was hesitating whether to tell you the truth or not until just before that day. But, for the sake of deceiving those guys with certainty, I judged that I shouldn't tell you. I also thought that if you hate me, then that would be a motivation for you to live.}



Surely Denreed also couldn't stay for long in the sealing room. That was why, after pretending to kill Yue at the palace, there was no doubt that there was also no time for him to talk with her.



Just how filled with bitterness that choice that he made, it was shown by the strength of his hand clutching at the other side of the image.



{Even so, it doesn't change that I had hurt you. I won't say anything like your forgiveness after this late. However, I want you to please believe only this. I want you to know this.}



Denreed's expression changed from anguish, into an expression of smiling while crying. That look was overflowing with gentleness and kindness, at the same time, it was also filled with a hopeless sadness.



{I love you, Aleytia. I love you from the bottom of my heart. I have never thought of you as bothersome, not even for once. ――I thought of you as my daughter.}



"…Oji, sama. Den-ojisama. I-, I too…"



Thought of you like a father. That feeling was flowing down along with the tears that traced through her cheek, unable to form into words. But, the strength of the hand that was clutching Hajime's hand conveyed that feeling more eloquent than anything.



{I'm sorry that I couldn't protect you. I'm sorry that I couldn't do anything but to entrust you to someone in the future. I'm sorry that I act like a pathetic father.}



"…Such things-"



What was in front of their eyes was a recording of the past. It was nothing more but Denreed's last will. But, such thing was irrelevant. Yue couldn't help but yell no matter what.



Something shining was gathering at the corner of Denreed's eyes. But, he didn't let that flow by any means. While enduring tightly, he spun words toward his beloved daughter with all his heart.



{I wanted to be at your side, seeing your figure when you grasped your own happiness someday. It was my secret dream to punch the man standing at your side once. And then, after that, I wanted to exchange sake with him, and say "please take care of my daughter". It was the partner that Aleytia chose. Surely, he would make a firm promise with a serious face.}



Denreed was looking at far away as though seeing a dream at the other side of the image. By any chance, there might be the Yue of the past at the direction of his gaze.



{It will be the time soon. There are more things that I want to talk, various things that I want to convey but…with my creation magic, I can only make an artifact of this degree.}



"…no-, I don't wanna-. Oji-sa, Otou-sama!"



Denreed smiled wryly at the approaching limit of the recording, to that Yue reached her hand while crying. Her uncle, no, her father's deep and deep affection, and that tragically tough resolve fiercely shook Yue's heart, indescribable feelings were overflowing out.



Hajime hugged Yue even tighter.



{I cannot be on your side anymore, but even if this life is about to run out I'll continue to pray. Aleytia. My beloved daughter. I wish for infinite happiness to shower above your head. For you to walk a path that is warmer than sunlight, and gentler than moonlight.}



"…Otou-sama-"



Denreed's gaze wandered. Surely that was because he was imagining the person who was being close with Yue.



{To you who is very close with my beloved daughter. It doesn't matter what kind of shape it is. Make that child, to be the happiest girl in the world. Please, I beg you.}



"…Naturally. I swear it with my life."



There was no way Hajime's words reached him. But, without any doubt, Denreed was smiling in satisfaction. Surely he was convinced of how the person in the future who listened to his words would answer. In various senses, he was a preposterous person. Perhaps it was just as expected from Yue's father.



The recording was fading down. Denreed's figure melted into empty air. It was as though his soul was going away…



Yue and Hajime were snuggling to each other so close that they wouldn't separate no matter what while gazing straight ahead, there the last words of Denreed resounded.



{…Sayonara, Aleytia. I wish that the whole world that is surrounding you, to be filled with happiness.}



Inside the deep forest, a crying voice was echoing.



It contained sadness. However, that was not all there was to it, it was a voice that was choked with warm tears of gratitude. That warmth gently enveloped Hajime.



Yue rotated her body and clung to Hajime's chest. There she vented her emotion to her heart's content.



It was unknown how long time passed like that.



Before long, Yue quietly lifted her face that was wet with tears. Hajime's hand gently wiped on those cheeks.



"Yue."



"…Nn."



While holding Yue's cheeks, Hajime spun his words along with a gaze that was filled with love and resolves.



"I, am the happiest man in the world. The proof of that, is inside my arms like this right now."



"…Nn. Then, I too, is the happiest woman in the world. The proof of that, is how I'm embraced like this right now."



In a distance where their lips could touch anytime, while feeling each other's breath, the two of them stared at each other. It felt funny for some reason, both of them chuckled a bit.



While chuckling like that, Hajime suddenly took out a ring. It was a simple silver ring. There was no special ability that was enchanted in it. If he had to say what was special about it, then it was a staggeringly tough ring, that was it.



That ring which was glittering brightly from reflecting the sunlight, was stared by Yue whose eyes were similarly glittering brightly.



"…nn. Proposal?"



Once, those words were said jokingly when Hajime handed her the accessories of magical bright stone series in the Orkus Great Labyrinth. At that time, Hajime spontaneously retorted but…



"That's right."



"…u"



This time, he responded straight back. His serious gaze was seriously conveying his feeling to her. As expected, Yue got shy and couldn't even say her usual "…nn". Her cheeks were already bright red like an apple.



"At Japan, the custom is for the man to say [Please give me your daughter] to the partner's father. That's why, I thought to say it in this place where Yue realized the true feeling of your father."



"…Nnu"



Because the one these words should be said to have gone, Hajime said it to the person herself.



"I want Yue. Everything of you, give it to me from here on until the future ahead too."



"…au"



Yue writhed.



Things like a reply or whatever, were obviously decided already.



A flower bloomed. The loveliest flower in this world. If there was a flower language for it, then the meaning would be unquestionably 'happiness'.



Yue answered, along with a smile that was gloriously blooming in full.



"…Nn-!!"



The ring that indicated eternity was fitted into the ring finger of the left hand that Yue presented forward. There was one more ring. This time Yue was the one who fitted it into Hajime's ring finger.



They showed the ring to each other, and then, they chuckled together.



After a while, Yue floated a mischievous smile while asking.



"…Then? How many rings Hajime are preparing after this?"



"…Yue. I think asking that in this kind of time is problematic."



"…Give it to Shia next."



"That's why, enjoy the afterglow a bit more before saying that…"



Hajime was about to protest at Yue who was leaking out a teasing smile, but then his lips were blocked by a finger. Like that Yue directed her gaze to the beyond.



Hajime who got lured by that and followed her gaze caught the sight of Shia and others running from inside the sea of trees. It appeared that Yue made such question because she noticed their presences.



"…Fufu. If it's Hajime, then you can make everyone happy together."



"If looked with common sense, I'm just a lowly bastard though."



"…Common sense doesn't work for the demon king-sama. Besides, no matter what shape it is, if the people themselves are happy then there is no problem."



"Well, I have determined and resolved myself so I have no hesitation anyway. Everyone, is mine."



"…Nn. That's my Hajime. But…"



Yue's eyes shined.



And then,



"…I won't hand over the 'special' position."



Saying that, Yue seized Hajime's lips.



From afar, with Shia, Tio, Kaori, Shizuku, Myuu, Remia, Aiko, Liliana as the first on the list, people were gathering one after another. The quiet and mystical place immediately became noisy like in the middle of a city.



While half of his sight was filled with the lovely vampire princess, Hajime looked at the girls at the other side and thought…



(Now then, when I introduced to Tou-san and Kaa-san, that everyone is my wives, what will happen huh…)



It seemed doubtless that even in Japan, Hajime would be in a whirlpool of turmoil.



However, surely Hajime would overcome everything of those. Crushing irrationality with irrationality, rewriting absurdity with absurdity, and if needed even fate would be destroyed, together with the 'precious' that he obtained in this world.



While making a gentle and also powerful smile, like now.



The tale of the young man who was summoned into another world, gifted with nothing but the talent of a common job, getting rid of even god while arriving as the world's strongest, had the curtain lowered now with this.



After returning to Japan, due to the turmoil that was caused by the return of the group who got spirited away, the wives problem of Nagumo family, the rabbit ear legend of Akihabara, etc, etc, it went without saying that Hajime and others would go through uncommon everyday filled with turmoil.



Those stories, would be told at another chance someday…



The End





Chapter 179-180




Arifureta Chapter 179-180



Arifureta After – Morning at the Nagumo House Part 1



AN: Thank you very much for a lot of the review about the completion.



From here on too, I, Shirakome, will enjoy myself while discharging wild ideas bit by bit, and it will make me happy if you readers can keep accompanying me.



「……Wake up. Wake up, Hajime.」



His dozing off awareness was led to awakening by a soft voice and a gentle shake. Because of the brightness seen through the back of his eyelids, he could tell the curtains had been opened. It was morning, and the sun was insisting on its presence.



「……Don’t mind me. Go on, ahead.」(TN: Here, Hajime is using a line like a hero who will stay behind so that others can escape safely)



「……It’s no good using a clichéd line like that. Breakfast will get cold. So wake up.」



He tucked himself into the bed like a bagworm and tried to take a journey into the dream world, this man who was trying to journey to the dream world with a voice that was going to disappear anytime, was the eldest son of this household――Nagumo Hajime. And then, the one who was making a troubled smile to such Hajime even while they kept urging him gently to get out of the bed, was Hajime’s beloved vampire princess that came from another world――Yue.



Yue sat down beside the bed and she gently stroked the black hair of Hajime who was curling in to himself. Her slender fingertips caressed through Hajime’s hair, combing them down. And then, her eyes squinted affectionately and she quietly brought her lips towards Hajime’s ear.



A small *chuu* sound resounded and Hajime twitched in reaction. Perhaps enjoying that reaction of Hajime, Yue’s look was increasingly bursting open in happiness, next she held Hajime’s earlobe into her mouth. Hajime once more twitched in reaction. Yue kept playfully nibbling, while Hajime kept twitching from that.



Yue separated her lips from Hajime’s ear with *chupa* sound before she opened her mouth while blowing a feverish sigh on Hajime’s ear.



「……If you don’t wake up……Hajime will be the breakfast.」



「I’ll wake up.」



It was a lovely speech, but there were his parents downstairs, other than them there were also the freeloaders and his daughter. Making a ruckus complete with moaning sound 「aah-」 from morning would be problematic in various meanings. The neighbors too would be guaranteed to look at him later with grinning expression saying 「oh my」. Therefore, Hajime pushed aside the futon with a snap and woke up.



「Good morning, Yue.」



「……Nn. Good morning.」



Hajime’s hair that was curling up here and there was fixed attentively by Yue using her hand as a comb. Since the morning the atmosphere of the two was already teeming with mushiness. It even felt like the morning sunlight brightly shining in through the window was growing dim in reservation from these two’s lack in prudence.



Hajime who was exposing a dazed waking up face, which was unthinkable if it was in the period when he was journeying through the other world, Tortus, was narrowing his eyes toward his lover that was caressing his head in front of his eyes. While he was at it he was also running his gaze through the surroundings relaxedly.



Inside the room, seventy percent of it was buried in bookshelves filled with books and games that were placed there, and then there was a desk and a reclining chair, a good quality desktop PC, and also a closet between the bookshelves. A window was attached to the wall that was facing south, and a navy blue curtain of the same color as the bed was hanging over it.



(…..I’m still feeling that this room is ‘nostalgic’. It must be because the experience on the other side was too strong. If I still feel like this even after going home for a year, then it might take a half year more to be able to live without feeling that anything is out of place.)



Hajime sighed a bit inside his heart. And then, he clenched his left hand repeatedly as though to ascertain it. That arm didn’t shine with a dull metallic gleam, its appearancewas that of a normal human arm. It had elastic skin and slight mark of suntan similar to his right arm.



Furthermore, Hajime also gently traced his right eye with his fingertip. There, he didn’t feel the sensation of an eye patch that was in the process of becoming his trademark in Tortus. Far from that, there wasn’t even the bluish white shine that was the trait of a god crystal. The eye’s appearance was a dark brown eye that looked like the eye of a normal Japanese person as expected.



「……Nn? Hajime, what’s wrong? It feels uncomfortable?」



Yue noticed Hajime’s state. She then brought her face closer until their nose tips almost touched while tilting her head. The sweet fragrance that tickled Hajime’s nasal cavity slightly bewitched him while he shook his head.



「No, there is no discomfort in both my arm and my eye. Thanks to Yue and the others’ cooperation, the artificial skin and the artificial eyes are all in extremely excellent condition. No one would notice them as long as they don’t get scanned in detail at a hospital. If I have to say, perhaps I’m feeling discomfort from this situation where there is no discomfort.」



「……? Hajime feels discomfort from the appearance of your body?」



「Yeah. After all, the experience over there was just too dense. The metallic arm, the crystal eye, and also the white hair, all those were already me. That’s why, rather than calling this appearance getting back to normal, it feels like I changed again. Well, its going to be really bad if that kind of unknown automail and strange crystal eye got discovered on this modern earth, so that can’t be helped though.」



While smiling wryly, Hajime tapped on his left hand using his right hand. The artificial skin that used metamorphosis magic had reproduced a splendid skin texture, making the one touching it unable to sense the existence of the metallic artificial arm hidden beneath it.



The one who accomplished this was Tio. The technique of Tio that was the only expert in metamorphosis magic among his comrades, added with Hajime and Yue’s help, remade the artificial hand smartly and disguised it as a normal arm in outward appearance and texture.



Also, Hajime’s artificial eye was something that was remade using creation magic, while his hair color was due to Kaori’s regeneration magic returning the hair color to before.



Of course, for Kaori whose hand had reached to the territory of time intervention, if she used regeneration magic seriously then it was possible she could even restore Hajime’s altered body to a normal human body. Whether it was his loss limb or his change due to eating monsters, all of those could be reverted if Kaori just returned Hajime’s body back to its previous state.



But, Hajime didn’t wish for that. Actually, by returning back to earth, things like a tough body were unneeded. But for some reason, it felt like turning his body back to how it was before was like making light of his journey in that other world. And above all else, he couldn’t be growing senile first and leave behind Yue who would be living for a long time.



In the end, possessing a monster class body where it wasn’t even definite that it had a life span was in agreement with Hajime’s own wish. By the way, if they were using Yue’s secret technique of apostle creation, then the problem of life span could be resolved to a certain degree even if they were using their original normal body, so Kaori and the others also didn’t view this matter as a problem.



「……Nn. Personally, there is no problem for me because I can enjoy various Hajimes. Rather I feel happy.」



Yue said that and gave kisses in turn at Hajime’s left shoulder, right eye, and his head. Every single action of Yue was overflowing with affection.



On that day, after they established the method of going home, since that day when Yue was proposed to under the great tree of [Haltina Sea of Trees], Yue’s expression of love had increasingly become polished. She had never been seen without the ring that was fitted on the ring finger of her left hand, and when Yue saw the matching ring that was fitted on Hajime’s left ring finger, an aura of happiness would be scattered in full from her.



「Speaking of that, what about Yue? Have you gotten used to the world over here?」



「……Nn. There are still a lot of things, that I don’t know, that I am not familiar with. This is really, a different world. There are a lot of unbelievable things……. But, it’s fun. Every day is fun like opening a jack-in-the-box.」



「I see.」



「……Nn. Besides, I will be happy anywhere if that is a place where Hajime is. Mother-in-law and father-in-law are also really kind. They treasured me like their real daughter, it feels really happy. Everywhere in Hajime’s world, is filled with happiness.」



「I, I see……somehow, it feels hot even though it’s morning huh.」



The gaze of Hajime who ate a straight punch of love was wandering around. Yue who understood that Hajime was being shy chuckled 「Nfufu」while snuggling at him like a cat. Hajime’s hand was subconsciously moving and gently caressed Yue’s fluffy hair.



An atmosphere that was overflowing with sugar content was running rampant since the morning. Yue quivered her long eyelashes while quietly closing her eyelids, her faint pink lips were pushing out to Hajime. Hajime easily surrendered seeing that obviously coaxing pose. His face was approaching near……



「Geez~, Yue-oneechan! Is Papa still not awake nano!?」



The one who opened the door of the room loudly with a bang while entering with a huff was a five year old girl who puffed up her flat chest. She was Hajime’s daughter Myuu. However, now her emerald green hair became emerald blond, while her fan shaped ears that were the trait of the merman race had changed into small and cute human ears.



The cause of the change was the illusion that was created by the ring artifact hanging down from Myuu’s neck. The artifact was something excellent that surprisingly could reproduce even the touching sensation, so even if Myuu’s ears were touched, the person touching wouldn’t feel the texture of a fin, but the sensation of a human ear instead. And so, Myuu’s appearance was completely that of a beautiful little girl with blond hair.



The moment that Myuu energetically entered the room, she pointed her finger at the clichéd childhood friend morning scene which entered her eyes and raised a protesting voice「Aa~~!」.



「Geez-, Yue-oneechan! I always told you every time! Doing that to papa right from the morning is a no-no! Why aren’t you protecting your promise nano!」(TN: Here Myuu said ‘me-‘ to Yue. This is the way people in Japanese scolded their naughty child or pet, it’s like saying ‘bad’ with scolding tone in English, though I translated it into no-no here.)



「……uu. Tha, that is because Hajime is……」



「Blaming others is a no-no!」



「……au. I’m sorry.」



Toward Myuu who pointed her index finger at Yue’s nose while saying 「Bad-」, Yue could only dejectedly hung her head down regardless of her big sister status.



It had been about a year since they moved into earth. Recently Myuu who had grown up remarkably was acting really proper and strict. When all the onee-chans who often became hopeless characters that couldn’t read the atmosphere when they got entangled with Hajime, like Yue right now, Myuu would remonstrate them with ‘Bad’ like this.



Actually, in order for Myuu to become used with this world quickly, and also because it was desirable for Myuu to have education in good taste, she was then enrolled into a nursery school about two months ago, but it seemed that in the school Myuu became awakened as ‘onee-san’ for some reason.



There was the factor of how based on her age she was included in the senior group in school, but additionally there was also how she had been piling up experience that should be too dense for a mere infant. She had been kidnapped, auctioned, traveled through a desert, struggling through a scene of carnage at the Devil King’s Castle, and even participated in a legendary decisive battle. Looking from the point of view of such a Myuu, the children the same age as her who were born in a peaceful country like Japan were, as expected, looked upon as really young and naïve.



Thinking ‘I have to be proper and strict!’, she imitated the outrageous onee-chan group around her and her mother that was overflowing with kindness, like that she acted too helpful towards the other kindergarteners……when she noticed, she had become the trusted and beloved leader of the kindergarteners.



However, her call of 「Gentlemen! And ladies of Myuu’s friend!」 when she was gathering the kindergarteners, or how she said 「Right now is exactly the time to blaze our souls!」when encouraging a child that felt down, or how she showed a fearless grin when there was a child that looked uneasy, those actions that looked a little bit unlike a kindergartener were conspicuous so the teacher there reported it to the Nagumo household……regarding the state of Hajime when he received that contact from the teacher, let’s just say that he was rolling around on the floor for real at that time.



「Really it’s my bad, Myuu. Come on, I’ve already woken up here.」



Yue who possessed the absolute dignity as the legal wife towards the other wives was seriously feeling down from getting scolded by Myuu. Hajime sent a glance at such a Yue while crawling out from the futon. Myuu listened to Hajime’s words and nodded, she then faced Hajime and reached out both her hands.



「Myuu? What’s with those hands?」



「Papa, Myuu wants to be carried nano.」



Even though she was scolding Yue just now, but right after that Myuu demonstrated a spoiled kid request. Yue went ‘hah’ in shock and moved her gaze to Myuu. Her eyes were clearly narrating her dissatisfaction 「Even though I was scolded when acting spoiled……」which was looking a bit lacking in maturity.



Toward that, Myuu said,



「Mama said, 『When Yue-san pulled back, immediately act spoiled(attack)』, like that nano.」



「……I’m going to speak a bit with Remia.」



Yue became enveloped with faint golden light, right after that, she became adult mode. And then, in order to speak a few words with the mother who taught woman’s battle tactics to a little child, Yue silently, but quickly, exited from the room.



And then, Myuu who kept holding her pose asking for a hug directed a shuddering gaze toward Hajime who was left behind. This little girl in front of his eyes was steadily mastering the lessons from the seniors around her. From here on, just what kind of growth this beloved daughter would show him after accepting the teachings of the women who had one or two peculiarities, Hajime wondered……



「Papa, carry me nano.」



「……Okay」



With a cramped expression, Hajime hugged Myuu who was making a cute request with a cute grin, and then he exited the room while listening to the tumult that was audible from downstairs.



Hajime who entered the living room on the first floor with one of his arms carrying Myuu witnessed the scene of Yue laying down complaints incessantly towards Myuu’s actual mother Remia. In regards to Remia, similar with Myuu, she was also exposing emerald blonde hair and human ears, right now she was showing her usual 「my my, ufufu」smile while dodging Yue’s complaints flightily――was how it looked like, but her cheeks were faintly blushing.



With the adult mode Yue as her opponent, as expected even a professional widow would find herself at a disadvantage. Even though they were the same gender, yet being stared at by the adult Yue fixedly from a very close range would make anyone unable to calm down. Adult Yue-sama, how terrifying.



「Ah, you finally woke up Hajime-san.」



「Fumu, as I thought perhaps having Yue in charge of waking up art no good.」



Shia who was helping with the preparation of breakfast was saying such a thing with an exasperated face while giving her morning greeting, and Tio who was watching morning news in the living room looked behind while also similarly greeting him.



There was no change in Tio’s appearance, while Shia’s prided rabbit ears were similarly hidden with artifact like Myuu and Remia. Right now her straight faint blue hair was put together using hair tie located around her neck and the bundle of hair was hung down forward.



「My, Shia-chan and also Tio-chan, you two are saying such things, but if it’s the two of you who are going to wake up Hajime won’t you two also dive in?」



「Naturally desu, Kaa-sama.」



「Of course, Hahaue-dono」(TN: Both ways of calling have the same meaning of mother, but the kanji they are written with has the meaning of mother-in-law.)



Carrying breakfast from the kitchen……wasn’t how she appeared, this person who appeared from the washroom as though to say that she had woken up just now, was Hajime’s mother, Nagumo Sumire. Sumire was a famous shoujo manga artist, so there were a lot of times where she was staying until late at night in her workplace, she was extraordinarily weak in the morning. Because of that, in the Nagumo household there was no regular habit of taking breakfast properly but……



There, Shia who was in charge of the cooking while in Tortus and Remia who was a mother with a child, came in. Hajime took home Yue and the others from the other world, and not long after that the girls became freeloaders, the kitchen became entrusted to the two of them.



「Everyone, good morning. Maaan, it’s great that the house is brilliant right from the morning. Even after a year has passed, my heart is still dancing every time I see this. You damn son, how dare you came home after becoming a great man! Really, thank you very much-」



「You are full of energy from the morning huh, Tou-san. And then, don’t grin like that while looking at them. You are going to get punched flying you know……by Kaa-san.」



The short haired middle-aged man with tall stature who had been continuously in a state of ‘Right now, I’m intensely moved!’ since a year ago, was the central pillar of the Nagumo household, the company president who managed a game company, Nagumo Shuu.



He who was a pure otaku seemed to be deeply moved everyday from witnessing Yue and the others who seemed to come straight out from 2D. And then, most likely, being called as 「Otou-sama」 by beautiful girls and women was also undoubtedly greatly related with that.



Shuu laughed in a good mood from being surrounded by his daughters-in-law, Sumire was in a daze, and Hajime was doing Myuu’s hairstyle while the breakfast was lined up on the dining table.



By the way, Shuu and Sumire’s yearly income far surpassed the earning of an average salary man, so the Nagumo household was quite large. And so, even when their family increased all of a sudden, the home didn’t feel that cramped even when all of them lived in one house.



Although, because of the sudden increase in the number of residents right now the renovation of the house was in progress, after several months passed the house would surely be completed into a splendid building twice the previous size that the neighbors would notice.



In addition, regarding the administrative concern of Yue and the others like their resident registration and the like, Hajime had snuck into the government office and finished forging the documents. For their peace of mind, Yue even used her soul magic on the government workers to plant suggestions in them so that there would be no problem. It was hard work because there were a lot of documents that needed to be put in order, for example passport and identification papers and so on, but at the very least there should be no one that could discover any unnaturalness with their existences in Japan.



Even for example that they got found out, they could just use soul magic to deal with it every time, they were also planning to slowly leave behind evidence of their existences at the foreign governments too. The government officials of the world would be opposed by age of god magic!



「Yup, Shia-chan, Remia-chan, today the food is also delicious. Before this I thought that putting food into your stomach right from the morning, “Is that some kind of torture huh?”, like that……but if it’s like this then I can eat no matter how much.」



「I get what you mean. Hajime, Tou-san is happy. My son became a splendid cheat harem bastard when he returned back. There is nothing that I can teach you anymore like this.」



「Tou-san, I don’t understand whether you are praising me or speaking ill of me from your words, but I have never received any lesson or anything about being a cheat harem bastard at all.」



Sumire sent an exaggerated praise at Shia and Remia excessively, while Shuu was sending Hajime words with condescending attitude, hearing that Hajime replied back with an exasperated state. To that, Shuu opened his mouth with irritating atmosphere as though to say 「Good grief, yareyare daze」.



「What are you saying? Haven’t I beaten up the soul of an otaku into you since you had awareness of your surroundings? In other words, that was also me beating up the soul of cheat harem into you. The reason that you were able to create a cheat harem in another world, is exactly because of that. How is that? Can you feel the gratitude for your Otou-sama keenly in your heart now?」



「I think I have already talked with you about my experience in another world, but where is an otaku soul is proving useful there――」



Shuu and Sumire had listened to all that Hajime experienced in the other world. About how much effort it took to recover his normal appearance, about how his arm and eye were artificial, about how his gaze turned sharp now, and above all about how his atmosphere now was completely different from in the past, Hajime told all of those personally without any falsehood or manipulation, nor he was even trying to do those.



In other words, Shuu and Sumire should have known about the sequence of events of their son’s grand experience starting from his experiences in the abyss. In spite of that Shuu now declared that otaku knowledge was useful in those experiences, hearing that Hajime was a bit unable to accept it.



And so, Hajime normally objected to Shuu, but Shuu and Sumire immediately grinned widely while cutting off Hajime’s words.



「『Ladies and gentleman-, all of you warriors-』」



「-」



「『Right now in this time, is exactly the time to blaze your soul-』」



「!!」



「『If you said you are going to get in my way, I’ll kill you.』」



「!?」



「『I’ll protect Yue, and Yue will protect me. With that we are――』」



「I got it already-! Otou-sama, really thank you very much-! That’s why, stop it-」



Hajime writhed while asking them to stop with a voice that sounded like a scream. Toward their son who was enduring his shame that much, the father and mother were mercilessly dealing the pursuing attack.



「Oi oi, what’s wrong Hajime? What are you feeling ashamed for? You were cool you know? In real life, there is almost no chance to say those kinds of speeches you know? When Tou-san watched the image recording Tio-san showed to me, my heart was trembling hard. Oh man, it was really an amazing chuu――cough-, really an amazing heroic speech you know?」



「Yes, truly. Not only to the girl partner, but you even said 『she is my woman』 to the girl’s parent, when I watched that I thought, “Just from what galgame this conquering character came from?”. Really……」



After giving a glance at Hajime who was shaking while holding his chopstick, Shuu and Sumire paused with a superb timing before continuing with splendid harmony.



「「Hajime-san, those were seriously awesome –ssu. Truly, thank you very much-!」」



「You two are noisy-. Don’t screw around, stop messing with me using that material-」



Shuu and Sumire knew about the events in the other world not only from Hajime’s story. While keeping it secret from Hajime, Tio used regeneration magic to leave behind recording images of every memory――obviously the events in the abyss were not included, other than that, the time when Hajime accepted Shia, the time when Hajime spoke resolutely to Tio’s grandfather Adol, and even Hajime’s speech to his classmates in the Devil King’s castle, etc.――and showed it to Shuu and Sumire. Since then, at every opportunity Shuu and Sumire would praise Hajime 「As expected from our son-!」 with teasing mixed in it to mess with Hajime.



The corners of Hajime’s eyes lifted up fiercely and brutally put pressure on Tio in an outburst of anger. With a cough, Tio choked in the middle of slurping her miso soup. Miso soup was dripping from her nose while her breathing was getting rough ‘haa haa’.



「A, as expected from the parents of Hajime-san. Recently I have become used to it, but as I thought, seeing the figure of Hajime-san being toyed around, the uncomfortable feeling that I get is not half-baked desu.」



「……Nn. But, the bullied Hajime……is also nice.」



「My my, Yue-san. Recently, it feels like if it is about Hajime-san then everything is fine for you. Fufu, Myuu too has to work hard like this. Also Tio-san, this is the dining table you know? Please don’t go *haa haa* while dripping snot like that, eat your food properly. Right now your face is looking quite “over the age limit” you know?」



Shia smiled wryly towards the exchange between Hajime and his parents, while Yue’s cheeks reddened for some reason, Tio was going *haa haa*, and Remia was going ‘my my, ufufu’ smilingly. This was the ordinary day of the Nagumo household recently.



Just when Hajime was going to snap from the mess, Shuu and Sumire easily drew back and concentrated on their breakfast as though nothing had happened. Hajime who was trembling from losing the target of his anger was then comforted by Yue and the others altogether.



With a sidelong glance at their son who was being taken care of by beautiful women and girls, Shuu and Sumire faced each other and their expressions burst into a smile.



「Nevertheless, that time when Hajime suddenly returned home, and in addition he also introduced Yue and the others, it was really shocking huh.」



「You’re right. For him to really go to another world and return home bringing a cheat harem, that’s something that I had never even dreamed of.」



While exchanging words with small whispers, both of them recalled that time when Hajime came home.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.



For the time being, I’m thinking of writing a bit about the story of post-going home.



After all there are considerable requests and also hope for a present-day story (lol).



Shirakome himself is swelling out with wild ideas.



Next will be the story of Hajime returning to his home and reuniting with Shuu and Sumire.



I think it most likely can be posted at 6 P.M Saturday next week.



Please take care of me from here on too.





Chapter 181




Arifureta Chapter 181



Arifureta After – Morning at the Nagumo House Part 2



AN: Regarding the autograph session at [Tora no Ana] that is planned to be carried out on 22 November because Shirakome is diagnosed with influenza, it was suddenly canceled in a hurry.



Please see the details in my action report.



Really, my deepest apologies to those who are looking forward to it.



I think I will get better if I can recuperate at home.



Please treat me well.



A year after a whole class from a certain high school was spirited away which made a stir in the world.



At first, the impossibility of a group kidnapping in the middle of the day inside a school, within an instant, without any other classes noticing, and the unlikeliness of it being a group disappearance from the half-eaten lunch, the unfinished homework, the kicked down chairs, etc., all of those heated up the media excessively toward this modern time Mary Celeste case that happened in a school.



However, what was called as the flow of society was quite callous, even the interest towards such a major occult incident didn’t continue for long. After half a year passed, with the news that there was no concrete progress within that short time, there were only impertinent commentators or self-alleged occult researchers harboring ulterior motives trying to use this case as their chance to make it big who kept trying to attract attention to this topic from various kinds of viewpoints while the media was sprinkled with new topics one after another, like some celebrity couple divorcing or getting into an affair, or some big shot politician having their dirty laundry aired.



Like that, the heated mass media calmed down and the interest of the people began to move to other topics. Even so, at that time, the family of the students, who were still missing without any information, and the police were still frantically searching for their whereabouts. However, unable to obtain even a single clue, every one of them was beginning to be encroached by fatigue and resignation.



Shuu and Sumire were also the same. They became exhausted from continuing to search for the whereabouts of their vanished son. While desperately believing that Hajime was safe and that he would definitely return home, they could definitely hear the flow of time that was heartlessly flowing away and the sound of despair that was gradually approaching them.



So that Hajime could come home anytime, they never missed a chance to clean up Hajime’s room for even a single day. And each time they cleaned the room, the coldness of the room that had lost its owner chilled their body. Even when they were in the living room, or when they were having a meal, what was echoing inside their ears was the voice of their son. While understanding that it was only their hallucination, many times they still suddenly looked around at their surroundings in surprise. It was already forgotten how many times they dashed to the front door every time they heard small sounds from there.



Even the 「family association」 that was formed together by the families of all the disappeared students only seemed to infect Shuu and Sumire with a chill to their hearts from looking at the faces of the parents who were losing their expression day by day.



And then, soon it would be one year since Hajime disappeared. For the two of them, that meant that the shadow of despair would only become thicker.



The tick-tock sound of the clock was echoing excessively clearly. Shuu, who was looking at his PC display, suddenly opened his mouth without turning away or stopping his hand that was clicking on the mouse.



「Sumire, how about going to sleep soon? Yesterday you already stayed until late right?」



「It’s no problem. If you are saying that, then you yourself, isn’t it better for you to sleep? Yesterday at work you had a lot of problems, right? You had almost no time to sleep at all.」



Late at night, Shuu and Sumire who had gotten thin due to their anxiety were checking the bulletin board on the PC and producing the flyer that called for information with a movement that was like a programmed machine. They were both exchanging words without even lifting up their face to look at each other.



「There is no problem with work. After all, my guys are all reliable. Even when the president is not there, it really doesn’t matter for them. Rather, I would just be a bother for them if I go to work with a face that looks like a ghost. Like that, they would even chase me out. Besides, doesn’t Sumire have it worse than me? You missed your deadline again right?」



「……Yes. But, that was only one time. My assistant is also excellent after all.」



Both Shuu and Sumire, in this one year they often took days off in their respective works of managing the game company or the manga serialization. Everything was for the sake of finding their son. Normally that kind of consecutive days off would make them lose the social trust from the people around them, but their coworkers and subordinates who knew about the circumstances of the two showed their understanding and even proactively cooperated with them. Thanks to that, they didn’t end up unemployed.



That was really an appreciated consideration so that in the case that Hajime came home, there would be no complicated situation like him witnessing both his parents becoming jobless altogether. There was also the factor that both of their work environments were special, and also how Hajime often showed his face at both his parent’s workplaces so the people there held favorable impressions of him. So the people at Hajime’s parents’ workplaces were also really worried about Hajime from the bottom of their hearts that Hajime had disappeared after getting involved with a sudden occult situation.



But even those people’s gazes were gradually changing into a gaze that was filled with a lot of pity, as though they were looking at something painful. Surely resignation had already grown thick inside them. There was no way they could say anything to the parents whose son’s whereabouts became unknown, but everyone had begun to think 「It’s possible, that Hajime is already……」



There was also no way that Shuu and Sumire wouldn’t notice such atmosphere. It also became a factor that cornered their minds needlessly, but the fact that they could take the time to search for Hajime like this now was also thanks to those people, so there was no way they could do something like exploding in anger towards them.



Even with their gloomy hearts, while both understanding that there was no way they could rest, they still exchanged barefaced words like recommending each other to rest.



After a while, Shuu and Sumire still continued to exchange dialogue that was really empty, but before long, after looking at the information board on the internet that was not only lacking in plausible information but filled with obviously fake information or inconsiderate writings instead, Shuu finally took off his gaze from the monitor screen.



And then, while sighing deeply, he put both his elbows on the table and his head hung down with both his hands covering his eyes.



「……Hajime. Just where is he right now……」



「Dear……」



Even though Shuu was still in the early half of his forties, right now he looked like a tired old man. Sumire who saw him like that also stopped her working hand and lifted her face.



「As expected, how about we rest a bit?」



「……You know that’s impossible, right? I won’t be able to sleep soundly anyway.」



「That might be true but……」



Sumire’s words were caught up in her throat. What Shuu was saying was wholly correct, she herself was also like that. No matter how exhausted their body and mind had become, but day by day the fire of uneasiness in their heart only kept broiling stronger. Such a thing stole their ability to have a quiet sleep.



「It will be fine. It’s still only a year. Even if it would take several years, we will find him without fail. No way am I going to collapse until then.」



「……You’re right. It’s just as you say.」



Her husband lifted his face with a wry smile, even so, there was a dark shadow that couldn’t be hidden there. Sumire smiled at him even while feeling concern, and then she stood up from her chair to nestle close to him.



But just before she could do that, suddenly *pin poo―n* there was a chime sounding from the entrance.



Naturally, at this time of day when the date had already changed, there was no way there would be anyone who would visit. If it was a relative then they should have contacted them beforehand, so the two of them faced each other suspiciously. That they were unable to reach ‘that possibility’ immediately, showed how exhausted the state of their heart was.



Shuu slowly raised his heavy waist and took the receiver off the intercom. When he did that, naturally the figure of the visitor was projected at the display……



『……Aa, that, what to say……this is, me, here.』



The state of the sudden visitor who was unable to smoothly decide what words to use while his gaze was wandering incessantly. If the people who knew of this person in this one year saw this attitude, they would surely stare in amazement reflexively.



Even from across the display, they knew.



This person’s air, look, and even height were different from the one in their memory.



Even so, they knew.



Shuu perfectly, and instantly knew. That person, who was looking awkward somehow with a frowning face that looked troubled was……the one who they had continued to search for, the one they believed would surely come home……



――it was their beloved son.



With a smacking sound, Shuu threw away the receiver phone and threw open the door of the living room with a force as though he was kicking it open. Without even hiding his impatience he roughly opened the lock of the front door, and then, he threw the door open.



And then,



「Aa……that…………I’m home, Tou-san.」



「「Hajime-」」



Shuu’s voice overlapped with Sumire who had chased after him unnoticed. They called the name of their son with a volume that might rip open their throat. At the same time, they tackled the son who was scratching his cheek awkwardly in front of the house’s gate.



「Hajime-, you, this stupid bastard! Where the hell have you been running around until now-」



「This stupid son-. Do you know how much you made us worry!」



Father and mother embraced their son altogether strongly, so strongly that it made it hard to breathe. Right now, in this moment, they were confirming that this son was really standing before their eyes. So that he wouldn’t disappear for a second time. They strongly, strongly embraced him.



The dim street light, the lighting leaking out from inside the house, and then the perfectly round moon in the sky were gently illuminating the family who became one once more. Amidst that Hajime was stiffening in a banzai posture while being hugged tightly by the two. (TN: Banzai posture, if you screamed banzai in celebration, usually you will also raise both your hands in cheers right?)



Hajime thought that his parents must be worrying about him. He was convinced that they were believing that he would return home.



But, even so, the figure and atmosphere of the current him, even though his hair color, his artificial eye, and his artificial hand were returned to his former appearance as much as possible, the him right now should be really different from how he once was.



That was why, he thought that they would surely feel confused. He even resolved himself in preparation for them to say doubting words like 「Are you really Hajime?」 in suspicion. Depending on the situation, there might even be a need to spend the time to reach an understanding, that was what Hajime was thinking in the corner of his heart.



It was just like how Hajime’s false image pointed out in one of the seven great labyrinths――at the 【Ice and Snow Cave of Shuune Snowfield】 before this, that in the depth of Hajime’s heart, he had the fear that the person who had been acknowledged by both himself and other people as a monster couldn’t be accepted by his parents, that was the cause of this emotion of Hajime’s that couldn’t be varnished over, which was both like himself but also unlike himself.



But, now that he had tried to open the lid, this was how it turned out. Shuu and also Sumire didn’t even give any attention to Hajime’s change, they gave him a tight hug that was overflowing with conviction and anger, and also a helplessly great relieve.



Inside Hajime’s body, a hot, yet silently strong emotion that was unfathomably deep was rising up. Every grand experience that he had experienced in the another world, were passing through his brain as though he was experiencing a revolving lantern.



And then, there was only one thing that he was thinking.



――Aa, finally, I came home.



Hajime’s two arms silently held the backs of his two parents. And then, with a trembling voice, he spoke it one more time in a small, but clear voice.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san――I’m home.」



Shuu and Sumire, with their eyes still overflowing with tears, separated themselves from Hajime slightly, and with a firm straight gaze, they gave him those words together with the escaping smile――surely for Hajime, these words were the mark that informed him of the end of his long and dangerous journey in the true meaning.



「「Welcome home, Hajime.」」



After that, Hajime and others who noticed that the neighbors were stealing peeks at the situation from the gaps between the curtains, excitedly returned inside the house.



It was a home that he left only for a year. Even so, Hajime narrowed his eyes in nostalgia, he couldn’t help himself to lightly caress his hand on the railing and the ornaments.



Entering the living room, Hajime saw a large amount of the leaflets scattered on the table. He took one of them into his hand and stared at it closely. After that, he also discovered the PC that was left opened displaying the site that asked for information on missing people.



「……This one year after you were gone, we tried everything we could to look for a clue. But, in the end, we couldn’t obtain even one clue. ……Hajime, you, no, all of you, just where in the world did you all go?」



「Also, Hajime. A year ago on that day, just what in the world happened?」



「……About that. Explaining it is simple, but also difficult. There are a lot of things that must be talked.」



The deep gaze of their son that already couldn’t be called as young at all, made Shuu and Sumire gulp. And then they guessed that Hajime had gone through a tremendous experience that they couldn’t even imagine.



「I see. Then, let me straighten up the table quickly, we are going to talk a lot after that. Wait a second. I’m going to brew a delicious milk tea now.」



「Yeah. Thank you, Kaa-san.」



「Fufu, somehow you completely feel like an adult.」



While drinking the sweet and warm milk tea that Sumire prepared, Hajime told the truth of the group’s disappearance to the two. Hajime’s experience was too dense to have everything said in one sitting. Therefore, he talked only about the summary of every important point, but even so, the summoning to another world, survival in the abyss, the separation with his classmates, the conquer of the great labyrinths, the legendary decisive battle……by the time Hajime finished talking about those, the sky was already starting to grow light.



Hajime, who had finished talking about the general event, emptied his cup that had been refilled several times, and then he sighed. Shuu and Sumire were also sighing tiredly. Shuu was rubbing on his eye with his finger while Sumire was dropping her gaze at the empty cup. They were silent from feeling lost as to how to respond.



「As I thought, is that hard to believe?」



Hajime asked while smiling wryly.



「That’s, obviously. Tou-san and also Kaa-san, due to our work we have plenty of knowledge about something like that but……thinking, that it happened for real……」



「That’s right. But, thinking about the extremely unnatural group disappearance, we cannot really reject that it might be true. There is also no reason for Hajime to lie in this situation. That’s why, our worry is, the possibility that someone is making Hajime believe such thing.」



「Haha, indeed, that way of thinking is way more realistic. Me too, if I were in the position of Tou-san and Kaa-san, surely I would also think that at first.」



Being kidnapped by unknown people, and then the group was then brainwashed and had the memory of fantastical nonsense inserted into their brain……indeed, rather than believing that he was going to another world and fought against monsters and gods there, that explanation sounded more plausible. Rather than they weren’t believing the words of their son, it was more that they were thinking realistically with worry that if such a thing was really done to their son then they would need to get him treatment quickly.



Hajime’s wry smile deepened to the two who were worrying about him, then he opened his mouth because there was something that he had to confirm no matter what.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Whether what I’m saying is the truth or not, there is a method to prove that. That’s why, assuming for now that what I’m saying is the truth, I want to ask something. ……Regarding the things that I had done, what do you two think? No, what do you think about the current me?」



That was the question that Hajime feared the most from the depths of his heart. If his parents held disappointment and fear, avoidance and disgust toward him then……as expected, that would be hard for him. Surely if that happened, Hajime would exit the house, and then he would leap into the chest of his beloved lover.



But, in contrast with the anxiety and nervousness inside Hajime’s heart, as though they had guessed the concern in Hajime’s heart, Shuu and Sumire showed a smile that looked troubled, or possibly exasperated.



「Now see here, Hajime. I and also Sumire, we aren’t saints you know?」



「Eh?」



Shuu and Sumire stood up from their seat and approached close to the side of Hajime who was perplexed.



「Rather than other people’s death, our son’s safety is far more important. Perhaps you think of that as cold-hearted, but that is what is called a parent. Good grief, for you to feel that nervous……I wonder if you are thinking of something like, perhaps I’m going to be chased out from home? Really, what a big idiot you are.」



「However……Kaa-san. Indeed, I killed because it was necessary, but I didn’t even hesitate in killing. That was how much I changed. A guy who is not even holding any avoidance or disgust for killing, can you accept someone like that?」



What a hopeless kid, Sumire who was brushing his head as though to say that was replied back by Hajime with an expression that was lost for words. Hearing that reply, Shuu opened his mouth in exasperation for real this time.



「It’s not about accepting or not, we are family you know? Something like stop being family doesn’t exist in the Nagumo family. Don’t you know? There is nothing that can make you stop being my son. The end result is, 『You cannot run away from Otou-sama!』」(TN: Might be a reference to something.)



「No, don’t make any quote at a time like this……」



「Hahaha, well, putting that aside. Hajime is my son, and I am a father. As long as that holds true, then me and also Sumire will be your ally anytime. There is no way anyone can worry about other people while their son’s survival is being threatened. Also, if you are feeling guilty, if you say that you want to atone to the family of the deceased then I’ll atone for it together with you, and even if you become a psychopath killer then I’ll stake my body and life to stop you.」



Most likely, if it was thought from the viewpoint of common sense then the way of Shuu and Sumire were doing things were mistaken. As a parent, no matter what kind of circumstance there was, they had to question the right and wrong of the killer. And if it was something unforgivable then they had to admonish the person. As a parent, they had to reprimand their child about their wrongdoing.



And surely Shuu and Sumire also understood that. But even with that understanding, they were still undoubtedly happy that their son returned home alive even by killing someone else. If Hajime had come to terms with it then that was fine, if for example, he wanted to atone for his sin then they as his parents would accompany him, and if he ended up as a fiend, then they would stake their lives to take him back to the right path. They declared that clearly to Hajime.



「Hajime, do you regret what you have done until now?」



「No, I have not even a bit of regret. I don’t even think that I’m mistaken. I decided to do what I did with the resolve against everything.」



「Yep. That’s how it has to be. But Hajime, that way of doing things won’t work in Japan you know?」



「I know. The journey that I started with the determination to kill all the guys antagonizing me is over already. That’s why I too have to change my way of living. Well, I might at least do something like planting trauma to those who stand in my way though.」



「I see, then that’s fine. Even if Hajime’s heart has grown to become unreluctant in killing people, reasoning and emotion still pro~perly exist inside Hajime. Then, that’s fine. It’s just as Shuu said, if Hajime actually steps on the wrong path, we are going to take you back even if we have to spank you, and take the responsibility together with you.」



「Kaa-san……」



Hajime thought, even when he had obtained the power to slaughter even god, but as expected, he was still no match against his father and mother. And then, he recalled his beloved daughter that he obtained in the other world, and he keenly felt how he was still lacking as a father.



Shuu and Sumire gently patted Hajime who was closing his eyes quietly. If they actually saw Hajime murdering someone with their own eyes, there was no way they wouldn’t be shaken. Perhaps it would become a trauma for them. Perhaps they wouldn’t be able to give him their words unhesitatingly like this.



Even so, one thing that they could say with certainty was, that them getting scared of Hajime, their son, and then distancing themselves with him due to that, was the only thing that they would never do.



That feeling was certainly conveyed to Hajime. Therefore, Hajime could only say one thing.



「……Thank you. Tou-san, Kaa-san.」



The eyes of Shuu and Sumire squinted gently.



While feeling the warmth of these parents, Hajime opened his eyes and showed a wide and mischievous grin to them. His heart was perfectly cleared. Hajime recovered his usual self due to the acceptance of his parents towards his changed self.



In that case, what was left was the report that in a sense was the most important report that he had to tell them. It would also become a proof about the other world that he told them about just now, so it would be two birds with one stone.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Do you remember, in the past……about the stupid talk of what am I going to do if I am summoned into another world?」



「Hm? Aa, I remember. If you are a man, then in a world of sword and magic you will surely want to defeat the demon king and build a harem, that was what I said, while Hajime, I think you said 『If it’s me, it doesn’t feel like I can defeat the demon king at all. What I can do, at best is to return home. And then if I find someone important for me there, then I’ll return together with them』, right?」



「Tou-san remember that well huh. Well, that’s how it is. I think I mentioned it a bit in my explanation before but……I found important people there. I want to introduce them to you, so is it fine right now?」



「Right now? It’s already dawn you know? Or rather, you made a girlfriend there!? Furthermore from another world? No, wait, I still don’t know whether the story of another world summoning is true or not……」



「Tha, that’s right, isn’t it? By any chance, that person might be the one who planted false memories in Hajime……. And then, that person will say something like 『If you want your son to return to normal, then please buy this holy vase. Don’t worry, if you buy it right now, I’ll give you a special fifty percent discount for this million yen vase you know?』!」(TN: In Japan there were cases of fraud where a salesman was selling a vase/pot, that they claimed was holy, possessing various effects, at a crazy price.)



Shuu who heard the full blown wild delusion of the frankly wary Sumire instantly went 「Sumire, are you a genius!?」 in agreement. While smiling wryly from witnessing his beloved being considered as a crooked salesman, Hajime’s gaze wandered at empty air.



「……Yue, can you hear me? It’s me.」



「Oi, Sumire! For some reason Hajime is talking to empty air see! Is this that? What is called as air girlfriend!? What should I do as a father like this!?」



「Calm down dear. We were careless……surely they had set up listening devices in our house! After this, the woman who will sell us the holy vase will arrive after getting called by Hajime you know!」



「What, the? Bastard, making my son as the stooge of your vase selling……don’t think that this is going to end up well for you. With my marvelous haggling technique, I’m going to beat down the price until below fifty thousand yen!」



Shuu and Sumire who couldn’t possibly understand that Hajime who was suddenly talking to empty air was using “telepathy” were greatly shaken up. Sumire was strangely speaking up a realistic assumption while Shuu became slightly panicked and hardened a slightly off determination. And then, before Hajime knew it, Yue had become a holy vase seller girl.



Hajime continued his telepathy while giving a sidelong glance at such parents.



「Yeah, it’s fine already. ……Yeah, I already talked about the gist of the events. I want to introduce all of you quickly. ……That’s right. You know the coordinates right? Yeah, then open a gate and come here directly. It’s at……let’s see, open it around a meter from my east.」



Actually, right now Yue was at the school building that Hajime attended before. When they returned to earth from Tortus, Hajime made the rooftop of the school building as the place where the gate was opened. From that place, it was easy for him to imagine his home’s position, and even if they arrived in the afternoon, normally that rooftop was locked and people were forbidden to enter there, the location was also outside of the public’s gaze. That spot was convenient to use.



And then, after the classmates returned to their own homes one after another, Yue and the others proposed to stay at the school. It was so they wouldn’t hinder Hajime’s reunion with his parents.



Naturally, Shuu and Sumire who didn’t know about that circumstances could only face each other in wonderment about their son who continued to talk towards empty air――they stiffened right after that.



With a distortion, the space right beside Hajime suddenly formed a vortex, and then it formed an ellipse shape right after that, and then a moment later a familiar scenery――a place that seemed to be a classroom of a school could be seen.



「A, Any**ere, Door?」(TN: Reference to anywhere door from Doraemon)



「E, eh? Wai-, this is just too fantasy so suddenly!」



While Shuu and Sumire were greatly flustered, Yue’s face peeked out with a plop from inside the gate. Those crimson eyes were wandering through the room with deep interest, and then those eyes narrowed joyfully when they captured Shuu and Sumire, at the end of which those eyes turned to Hajime and wordlessly inquired 「It’s fine to enter?」



「Welcome, to the Nagumo household. Come in without reservation.」



「……Nn」



With Hajime’s welcoming words, Yue slowly stepped into the Nagumo house. The space hole that suddenly opened inside the room and the beautiful girl who was like an awakened bisque doll that appeared from there caused Shuu and Sumire to open and close their mouths wordlessly in obvious turmoil.



Hajime stood beside Yue, and while grinning mischievously like a kid who succeeded in his prank, he introduced his beloved lover.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Her name is Yue. She is my special person. By the way, she is a person of another world, a vampire, and a former princess.」



「「-, Template attribute!?」」(TN: I think what they mean here is how Yue has so many clichéd character attributes.)



Shuu and Sumire splendidly returned a response that was impossible for run-of-the-mill people. Inside her heart Yue was feeling warm and fluffy thinking 「Aa, they are really Hajime’s parents」 while at the same time, feeling a bit nervous in this important event where she was greeting her lover’s parents, she pinched at the edge of her skirt, and showed a courtesy gesture that was overflowing with elegance and beauty.



「……How do you do, Hajime’s Otou-sama, Okaa-sama. Please call me Yue. Please take care of me for many years to come.」



「E, o, ou. No, I need to be polite here. Please take care of me too desu?」



「Ple, please take care of me, desuwa?」(TN: Both of the parents also used extremely polite language here)



The shock from witnessing the blond-haired crimson-eyed beautiful girl that looked like she came out from a picture book, and also this being the introduction to their son’s lover for the first time in their life, caused the end of their sentence to actually turn strange. The figures of his parents lowering their head repeatedly and incoherently deepened Hajime’s grin, however, as though to say that 「It won’t end with just this much yeah!」 he opened his mouth once more.



「Shia, it’s okay now!」



「Hai desuu! Tou-sama, Kaa-sama, I am called Shia! Please take care of me desuu!」(TN: The Kaa-sama and Tou-sama used by her is the kanji for in-law.)



「「Rabbit eaaar, it cameee―!?」」



Shia leaped out from the gate with a wide smile while her rabbit ears were flopping around. Shuu and Sumire showed a splendid harmonious reaction to the appearance of this second beautiful girl. Without even any composure to reply, their eyes became nailed to the rabbit ears that were moving around.



「Tio, come!」



「Uh huh. This art our first meeting, Chichiue-dono, Hahaue-dono. I am Tio Clarce of the dragon race, a mistress of Goshujin-sama, and also his sex slave. Please take care of me forever from here on.」



「「Sex slave!?」」



With twin hills that looked like they were going to spill out anytime, and dragon wings spread and flapped behind her in order to expose her true form, Tio made that greeting that was relatively no good. Hearing that caused Shuu and Sumire to spontaneously stagger. It appeared that the consecutive shocking developments made their feet unsteady.



「Remia, Myuu!」



「Yes dear. Nice to meet you, I am called Remia. Please take care of me, together with my daughter.」



「E, err, err……I, I am Papa’s daughter Myuu desu! Ojii-chan, Obaa-chan, please take care of me nano!」(TN: Ojii-chan=grandfather, obaa-chan=grandmother)



「O, Ojii-chan!?」



「Da, daughteeer!?」



The beauty who lowered her head politely with a graceful appearance, and the small Myuu who gave her all in greeting. Shuu and Sumire were finally paralyzed from the astonishing words of Myuu. And then, *gigigi* their gaze moved toward Hajime like a machine that had forgotten to be oiled.



Their eyes were speaking their feelings more eloquently than anything. That was to say, 「Explain what is the meaning of this!」



Therefore, Hajime answered concisely.



「Myuu is my daughter, and all of the others are my wives. Well, please take care of them okay.」



「「So casual!?」」



「Ah, by the way, there are four more wives, so I’ll have them give their greeting on another day.」



「「Real cheat hareeem!?」」



As expected, the two of them splendidly synchronized in a splendid reaction.



And then, the parental heart that was unshakeable even when their son confessed to being a killer went 「You, are you really my son!?(Shuu)」 and 「You, are you really that son of mine!?(Sumire)」 in great agitation and fluster, and then Shuu suddenly went ‘I revealed the trick!’ and yelled 「No, wait, Sumire! There is no way girls this cute are real! Everything is CG! Don’t get tricked!」, hearing that Sumire yelled 「Dear, you are a genius! Hajime, open your eyes! Even if 2D girls are converted into 3D, in the end, they are just false images. It will only end in vain!」 with a sorrowful expression……



Anyway, the room already descended into a grand pandemonium.



However, even that pandemonium didn’t continue for long.



It was because Myuu who sensed that they weren’t welcomed from the state of the two parents got depressed, then she asked 「Ojii-chan, Obaa-chan……is Myuu no good?」. The result from that went without saying.



「How do you do, I am Myuu’s Ojii-chan you know?」



「How do you do, I am Myuu-chan’s Obaa-chan you know?」



They splendidly got back on their feet within an instant. Their figure that was knocked out helplessly by Myuu’s sly loveliness was exactly the same as Hajime as expected.



Like that, after they managed to get back on their feet, seeing the fantasy phenomenon that happened in front of their eyes and the beautiful girls who were not human, the two people who right from the start had high resistance to this kind of thing due to their nature of work immediately confirmed the truth of Hajime’s words.



After that, there was a great commotion of ‘hip hip hurray’. The too real this and that which their son experienced, and the real harem of beautiful girls……their otaku soul ate it up energetically before they threw a barrage of questions at Hajime and the others with eyes shining brightly.



When Tio used regeneration magic to get out the image recording of Hajime’s battle that she recorded, strange voices resounded through the residential area in the morning. 「UoOOOOOO-, AWESOOOOMEE! Did you know, did you know huuuh!? That’s, that’s my son! Thank you very much!」or, 「KyaAAAA-, you heard that!? Just now, he said something amazing you know! This is bad! This child is seriously demon king-sama! And then, demon king-sama is my son desu! Thank you very much!」 and so on. Perhaps because the two were also staying up all night without sleeping, their tension kept raising and raising up, in the end, the two of them continued to make a commotion until Hajime who became unable to endure the shame made them go ‘abababa’ using Lightning Clad. (TN: That abababa expressed cartoonish electric shock, where the person that got shocked exposed their skeleton and ended up with only smoking body and curled up hair.)



「……Nn. As expected from Hajime’s Otou-sama and Okaa-sama. They are completely out of the ordinary.」



「Certainly, it feels like that they are really Hajime-san’s parent like this desu.」



「It can even be said, that this is only natural for Goshujin-sama’s Chichiue-dono and Hahaue-dono.」



「Ufufu, they resemble Haijme-san, what a unique personage.」



「Yep-, Papa, really resembled Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan nano!」



Yue and others spoke their impression while lukewarmly staring at Shuu and Sumire who fainted with great smiles.



To those impressions, Hajime said a sentence.



「What the hell do you guys mean by that?」



Hajime’s expression turned speechless.



Shuu and Sumire who returned from their reminiscence called with wide grins at their son’s family who were flirting and frolicking in a sense at the morning dining table.



「Which reminds me, Hajime. You are going to meet with Kaori-chan and the others today, right? You are not going to be late?」



「Aa~, it will be at past noon, so there is no problem.」



「Shizuku-chan will also come, right? What about Ai-chan?」



「It seems that Shizuku will come together with Kaori, but Aiko, I think she can come, but perhaps she will be late. She has her work and also her position after all.」



Hajime shrugged, while Sumire lowered her eyebrow in sympathy thinking 「Ai-chan also has it hard eh.」



Today Hajime had the plan of having dinner with everyone, including Kaori and the others too. The classmates would also participate so it would be something like the class reunion of the people who got summoned to the alternate world. Although currently all of them were still active students, so the nuance was a bit different.



「Oi, Hajime. Tell Kaori-chan and the others to show their faces here more often. About beautiful daughters in law, the more the better.」



「That’s right. Or rather, if the houses reconstruction is finished, it’s okay for them to live here instead you know? Isn’t it the best when the house is lively and merry?」



「……The girls themselves don’t really mind that……rather, they seem to want to come normally, but their families don’t seem to approve. Well, that’s the sensible decision.」



At the corner of his mind, Hajime recalled the time when he met the family of Kaori and Shizuku while shrugging.



「H~mm, there is that. Well, just tell them that Kaa-san will welcome them anytime. Also……fufu. I won’t mind if you are going to stay over tonight you know?」



「Debauchery party eh! What a terrifying child even as my son.」



「You are noisy. I told you already I’m going to come home normally. Really, Tou-san and Kaa-san are……」



Hajime’s expression turned somewhat tired right from the morning. The wives from another world watched over that exchange between parent and child smilingly.



What was unfolding before their eyes, was certainly a peaceful and gentle, normal every day of a family.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.



I think in the next chapter, I’ll try writing about going out around the city with the wives.



It seems that the heartwarming story without much development will continue, but I’m also wanting to write a long extra story before long so I will be happy if you all can read while feeling the heartwarming atmosphere.



……If Shirakome has more time……real life, you bastard……





Chapter 182




Arifureta After – Downtown Date? Part 1



AN: I’m sorry, this chapter is a bit late……



It’s short but, please have mercy.



At the station plaza several blocks away from the neighborhood of Hajime’s house, there was quite a splendid fountain installed. Many people were bustling around on this holiday.



Naturally, there were a lot of young males and females in that spot who seemed to have rendezvous appointments. Their gazes often moved alternately towards their watches and the direction that the person they were waiting for would come from, or they were playing around with their smartphones to kill time.



Amidst those young people, there was the figure of Hajime. What seemed to be different from him compared to other people, was that he never particularly looked at his watch or played with his smartphone, he kept sitting on the bench beside the fountain while staring absentmindedly at empty air, like a father who was taking his children out to play on a holiday while slackening from the fatigue of his everyday work.



Yet, regardless of his slackening atmosphere, there was a vague presence from him as though his back was standing straight, perhaps it was because of the abnormal experience a normal youth of the same age would never encounter that Hajime had piled up.



While Hajime’s body was in a really relaxed posture, the attention of the surroundings was naturally attracted to him because of that presence he exuded. Despite the strange sense of security that his calm atmosphere caused, there was also the slight aroma of danger that came from him.



Due to that, perhaps it could be said as only natural that sometimes there were groups of girls who kept glancing toward Hajime. There were also girls whispering to each other with slightly reddened cheeks among those groups, who were on the verge of doing reverse picking up. (TN: Gyaku nanpa: Instead of a man calling out to a woman on the street, it was the woman who called on a man in reverse.)



It was a popularity that was unthinkable for Hajime before he got summoned to the alternate world Tortus.



「……Should I use presence isolation like this?」



Naturally, for Hajime who possessed monstrous specs, the movements of the surroundings were leaked into his ears, he muttered such thing while his posture and gaze stayed unmoving.



Like that, a group of girls with courage(?) finally approached timidly in order to call out to Hajime, at that time when the surrounding girls and boys were observing carefully, an energetic calling voice that caused them to open their eyes wide in shock resounded.



「Ah, you are there nano~. Papaa~~~~!」



*sutetetetete―* The one who dashed from the street of the station was Myuu, her emerald blond hair was lightly fluttering while a full smile was pasted on her face. That lovely figure of a foreigner beautiful little girl running with her all caused the gazes of all the people at the station plaza to move to her.



As though to say ‘who cares about those gazes!’, Myuu didn’t show any reaction at all and keeping her momentum she dived at Hajime who was slacking up on the bench.



Like a bullet, Myuu leaped at full power without a single shred of reservation or mercy. Normally, Hajime would match the timing and sway back to perfectly kill the impact and gently catch her, but right now he was sitting on the bench so he couldn’t do that.



And so, one of Hajime’s hands gently scooped the jumping Myuu’s shoulder and he skillfully converted the charging momentum into rotation. So to speak, it was something like Aikido. Just before Myuu impacted the stomach of Hajime in midair, she was twirled in a rotation and like that she was dropped down to sit on the lap of Hajime.



「Oy, Myuu. I told you many times already, don’t jump because it’s dangerous.」



「Ehehe~, I’m sorry nano~」



Myuu blinked for a moment because she didn’t understand what happened, but seeing Hajime who was warning her with a wry smile, she immediately grinned loosely and leaned back snugly at Hajime’s chest.



Hajime made a troubled smile seeing the state of his beloved daughter who didn’t seem to reflect on her action at all. He then used his hand to change the way he held her and then he stood up.



From the surroundings, 「E, eee? Papa? Just now, that girl called him papa?」 or 「Lies, he has a child!?」, or 「Oi oi, how old is that guy……if that kid is his child, then just when was she born……」, or 「Rather than that, just now was amazing wasn’t it? That kid was rotated in a full circle you know?」, the topic was spreading with an amazing momentum in the plaza.



But, the entrance of Myuu was still only the beginning. All of them would witness even more shocking scenes after this.



「My my, Myuu. Mama told you that it’s no good for you to run off alone, right? After all, it’s easy to get lost in this world……」



「Mamaa. But, Papa is here so……」



「Ufufu, Myuu really is a daddy’s girl. Dear……thank you for waiting.」



With her sandals making cute sounds *patapata* from each step, wearing a long skirt and elegant cardigan, also swaying emerald blond hair that was braided with a hair tie, Remia finally arrived.



Seeing the entrance of an older, or rather a foreigner onee-san who had plenty of sex appeal of a widow, *gulp* the sound of someone gulping their saliva could be heard from somewhere. Several men were already sending piercing gazes of envy towards Hajime who had beauties as his wife and daughter.



But, still not yet. It still wasn’t over yet with this!



「Hajime-saa~n, thank you for waiting~.」



「My apologies for making you wait, Goshujin-sama.」



The ones who were saying that with their arrival were Shia, with her faint bluish white long straight hair swaying, wearing a miniskirt from which her white slender beautiful legs were generously exposed, and Tio who wasn’t wearing her usual kimono but instead wore loose trousers and a V-shirt along with a long cardigan.



Both of them were owners of good looks that could make idols or actresses run away barefooted in shame. Two such girls were approaching towards Hajime who seemed to already have a wife and child with obvious good will coloring their whole face.



The gazes of the people at the station plaza were already in a glued state towards Hajime without being able to take their gazes off. Their curiosity kept rising over the limit.



While completely ignoring those people, Hajime shrugged while still carrying Myuu.



「You all wanted to try having a rendezvous, right? I don’t really mind. Spending time not doing anything only staring absentmindedly at nothing is not bad sometimes.」



Yes, it was just as Hajime said, if it was asked for what reason these people who were living at the same house were meeting at the station plaza at an appointed time, that was because of the request of the female camp. Hajime thought in his heart that it was better to go together, but if he was requested for something like this then he couldn’t reject it. It was a cute request for him.



「So, what about Yue? You all came together, right?」



Hajime tilted his head seeing that there was only one of his lovers who hadn’t yet appeared at this place.



「Aa, I think Yue-san will arrive soon. There were some guys picking up women in the train, so Yue-san was taking care of them while telling us to go ahead.」



「Taking care……don’t tell me, she isn’t going to smash them, right? Spare me from that. If the monster of the clothing store will be overflowing even until this world……I’m prepared to even wage war you know?」



「Even though Goshujin-sama is a godslayer, thou art still not very good against Christabel and the others huh.」



Hajime’s expression cramped from listening to Shia’s explanation. Tio was being somewhat exasperated seeing that state of Hajime, but when she thought from the point of view of Hajime whose ass kept getting stared feverishly each time by those manly women of another world, her gaze was changing into sympathy thinking that it might be something that couldn’t be helped.



By the way, according to Shia’s additional explanation, it seemed that Yue would only toy with the guys’ memory and mind using soul magic, and she wouldn’t use the crotch smash. For the time being, Yue and the others had also learned of the proper method of dealing with trouble in Japan, which had strict laws to maintain order compared to the other world.



While they were talking like that, Hajime suddenly felt a restless sign from the direction of the station street, so Hajime turned his gaze there.



Sure enough, from there he could see the figure of a beautiful girl with crimson eyes and golden hair that looked as though she came right out off the screen, walking with a calm air majestically, and also with elegance and gracefulness at the same time, as though she was a queen walking on a red carpet.



Yue wasn’t in her girl mode that was normally in the appearance of a twelve year old. She had transformed her appearance similar to Hajime, into an age of around seventeen years old. There was no need to mention her bewitching air, the faint smile that was pasted on her lips might be from her feelings towards her beloved that was at the end of her sight. That smile also exposed tenderness, which was magnifying the charm of her perfect beauty by several times over.



Yue, who should be called as a peerless beauty from just a glance, was exuding out an adult charm, but the clothes that she came wearing were a loose parka and lacy skirt that honestly seemed to be rough yet cute. That style of clothing pushed aside the difficult to approach aura that was characteristic in a beautiful person which further boosted up her charm.



Anyone who caught sight of Yue, regardless of their age or gender, they would have their gaze drawn in without exception. The sounds of *gon-*, or *gashan-*, or *bachikon-* that could be heard from here and there, were the sounds of disaster that were played by the victim of Yue. In a sense, she could be called a walking disaster.



A youth crashed into a telephone pole because he was walking while watching Yue, a group of boys that seemed to be students were stampeding over a store’s signboard, a girlfriend who came back to her senses slapped her boyfriend beside her to drag him back to reality.



However, Yue didn’t pay attention to those at all. She walked forward dashingly, and before long, amidst the gathered attention, she had approached Hajime’s side.



「……Nn. Hajime, thank you, for letting us to have a “rendezvous”.」



Yue then put her lips on top of Hajime’s. That act was really natural, as though doing that was only a matter of course, like how if the wind blew then the leaves would sway.



Yue put her hand gently on Hajime’s chest with her feet standing on her tiptoes to make herself a little taller in order to kiss Hajime. Seeing such a Yue caused the surroundings to get shaken.



「Geez, Yue-oneechan is unfair nano! Myuu is going to do ‘chuu’ too!」



「My my, then I too……」



「Uu, it’s a little embarrassing in front of a crowd like this desu, but……」



「Art that so? Rather, this makes me a little excited though?」



Right after Yue separated from Hajime, Hajime nonchalantly evaded the octopus kiss of Myuu who aimed at his lips and redirected it on his cheek. After that, he accepted Remia and Shia’s kiss while gifting a slap to Tio. In the end, the female camp cheeks were blushing, and one pervert was going ‘haa haa’ while holding her slapped cheek.



The scene of a real harem, where one man with a child was exchanging kisses with multiple beautiful girls and women, caused the tension of the people in the area to break through the limit. 「What the hell is that!? What is going on!? Is this a shooting of some show!?」 some panicked, 「Tha, that man, what kind of person is he!? Is he the son of a financial conglomerate somewhere?」 some were imagining the true identity of Hajime,「Thi, this is Japan right?」 and some were doubting their own whereabouts, the crowd was getting really busy with their thoughts.



At last, some people with smartphone cameras appeared, deciding that there was no way they were going to let go of this rare scene.



But, without a single exception,



「E, eh? Wai-, the screen light vanished suddenly!?」



「What’s this, it got noises all over!?」



「No way, is it broken!? Spare me from that!」



Like that, all the smartphones suddenly became out of form and the people couldn’t take pictures using their phones. The cause of this was naturally, Hajime. By performing a minute adjustment to his characteristic magic “Lightning Clad”, he emitted out electromagnetic waves that disrupted the electronics in the area. Of course, if the electronic device got away from Hajime then they would return to normal.



「……Nn. It became noisy. Hajime, let’s go soon?」



「No no, what are you trying to do attempting to depart naturally like that. There are still members who haven’t arrived here yet.」



「……? Hajime, you are feeling tired right now.」



「You think I’m Agent Mu**er. Don’t try to avert the topic with X-Fi*e make-believe.」(TN: X-Files series, FBI agent Fox William Mulder. Don’t know what this refers too though, never watched X-Files)



Even while knowing that there were members who hadn’t arrived yet, Yue urged them to depart with a really natural gesture. To that, Hajime smiled wryly while making a retort.



「……It’s fine, there is no problem. Those two had severe constipation and cannot co――」



「Yuee~~~~! What are you saying~~!」



「Wait a second, no matter what, that lie is just too cruel don’t you think!」



Yue’s deceiving words that were too cruel to be targeted to a maiden were cut off by Kaori who was running to here wearing a feminine one-piece dress, with her body returned to her original body, and Shizuku, whose trademark ponytail was swaying behind her.



The further addition of two more beautiful girls caused the surroundings to become hectic. Kaori only gave that a glance before glaring sharply at Yue right away. And then she immediately turned her gaze to Hajime and smiled gently.



「Sorry, Hajime-kun. You’ve waited long?」



Hajime was going to open his mouth, but before that happened,



「……Nn. He waited feeling bored to death. As punishment, Kaori is to go home right away. Now, quickly go home. Now, now.」



「I won’t go home! Yue you bully-. Yue who is saying something like that is the one that has to go home!」



Yue kept pushing away on Kaori, to that Kaori reacted honestly and pushed back at Yue. This was what was called as “Hand Four” in pro-wrestling. The two girls were grappling with each other putting all their strength into it. Both of their foreheads pushed at each other without any side taking a single step back. (TN: Don’t know if that’s the correct name, Yue and Kaori here were pushing at each other with their hands grasping the other’s hands and also their foreheads coming into contact.)



By the way, that Kaori was able to face Yue equally despite not being in the body of an apostle was because Kaori’s original body itself was inserted with the factor of apostle flesh and changed into a specially made body.



It was a body reconstruction for the sake of clearing the problem of the difference in lifespan between her and Hajime and the others, but that wasn’t all, she was also able to activate “Apostle Mode”, in that case, her hair would change to silver and she could let out wings from her back. Of course, she could also use the disintegration ability and twin sword arts without any problem. ……Though those were something extremely unneeded in this peaceful Japan life.



Yue and Kaori were always quarreling about something, but the one who took the lead in the body reconstruction of Kaori was none other than Yue. Perhaps due to the influence when she was taken over by Ehito, Yue somehow understood the method to create apostles, so by using all age of god magic and with the help of Hajime and Tio, the apostlefication of Kaori succeeded splendidly. Their closeness was as great as how much they were quarreling……perhaps this phrase existed to describe these two.



「Err, Hajime. I think we came right on time but……I wonder if we made you wait?」



Even while looking troubled at the quarrel of the two, Shizuku asked timidly at Hajime. Of course, Hajime said no to the question. Shizuku sighed in relieve hearing that, and then after she looked around feeling a bit embarrassed, she asked Hajime with reservation.



「Say……I wonder if I look strange?」



That question was naturally referring to the fashion she was wearing. Shizuku, before she was summoned to another world and even while she was in another world, basically kept wearing pants, but today her appearance was wrapped in a flare skirt and no-sleeve shirt. Although looking from the length of her skirt that reached around above the knee, and the properly fastened buttons on her skirt, this appearance was also really like Shizuku.



「Yeah, I think you look cute. Or rather, before this too, I told you already that you don’t need to get that shy just from wearing a skirt, right? After all, it really suits you.」



「Is, is that so? Fufu, thank you.」



The appearance of Shizuku who was shyly fiddling around with her skirt, if the self-alleged little sisters who idolized her as Onee-sama saw this then they would surely faint without a doubt. That was just how lovely the figure of Shizuku who was letting out her natural girlishness in front of Hajime was.



And then, Yue and Kaori whose hands were still grappling each other with only their heads turned towards that exchange between Hajime and Shizuku were,



「……So nonchalantly, taking the delicious part like that. Shizuku, what a terrifying child.」



「Shizuku-chan……recently, you are not stopping me even when I was quarreling with Yue aren’t you……」



Even the whispers of those two didn’t reach the ears of the swordswoman-sama whose maiden power was in full throttle right now.



After that, Kaori who noticed that Yue and others had kissed Hajime pressed Hajime for a kiss as expected while Shizuku whose face became bright red thinking ‘such a thing is impossible in front of the crowd!’ got a little depressed that it would be only her who didn’t get a kiss. But Hajime, who was unable to be indifferent to that state of Shizuku, forcefully kissed her which caused her to faint. It went without saying that the station plaza became a pandemonium after that.



Seeing that the commotion was also getting larger, Hajime and the others set out to the city for a date until five o’clock, when the dinner party with the summoned classmates would start.



「I have……seen something amazing.」



After that, someone among the people who were left behind whispered that. That sentence was exactly something that represented the feelings of everyone in the station plaza.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.





Chapter 183




Arifureta After – Downtown Date? Part 2



On the street that was slightly distanced from the downtown main street, in the fast-food restaurant that was facing the street, at the window-side seat on that restaurant’s second floor, the figures of three young men who seemed to be high school students could be seen slacking up listlessly on the chair, as though to say that they had too much free time to spare.



Above the tray that was put on the table in front of the three, burger wrappings that had been crumpled up into a round shape and empty French fries containers were scattered about carelessly.



「Aa~」



While scowling at the juice which had become thin due to the melting ice, one of the high school students was discharging out a strange groan. Hearing that, the remaining two students directed an annoyed gaze and an understanding gaze at the first student.



「I know that we got nothing to do, but don’t make that kind of voice. It’s embarrassing.」



「You are saying something like that huh. On this precious holiday, three men are jabbering like this……haaa~. On top of having nothing to do, this is just empty……」



「Don’t say that. That’ll just make you feel emptier.」
